Akhenaten - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Family 
2 Early life 
3 Reign Toggle Reign subsection 
3.1 Coregency with Amenhotep III 
3.2 Early reign as Amenhotep lV 
3.3 Name change 
3.4 Founding Amarna 
3.5 International relations 
3.6 Later years 
3.7 Coregency with Smenkhkare or Nefertiti 
3.8 Death and burial 
3.9 Legacy 
4 Atenism Toggle Atenism subsection 
4.1 Implementation and development 
4.2 Atenism and other gods 
4.3 After Akhenaten 
5 Artistic depictions 
6 Speculative theories Toggle Speculative theories subsection 
6.1 Akhenaten and monotheism in Abrahamic religions 
6.2 Possible illness 
7 Cultural depictions 
8 Ancestry 
9 See also 
10 Notes and references Toggle Notes and references subsection 
10.1 Notes 
10.2 Bibliography 
10.3 Further reading 
11 External links Toggle the table of contents Akhenaten 92 languages Afrikaans Alemannisch  Asturianu Azrbaycanca     Bnlmg   Bosanski Brezhoneg Catal  etina Cymraeg Dansk Deutsch Eesti  Espaol Esperanto Euskara  Franais Galego    Hrvatski Ido Bahasa Indonesia slenska Italiano    Kiswahili  Latina Latvieu Lietuvi Lingua Franca Nova La .lojban. Magyar Malagasy    Bahasa Melayu Mirands Nederlands Nedersaksies    Norsk bokml Norsk nynorsk Occitan Ozbekcha     Plattdtsch Polski Portugus Ripoarisch Romn  Scots Sicilianu  Simple English  Slovenina Slovenina    srpski Srpskohrvatski   Suomi Svenska Tagalog    Trke   Ting Vit Winaray  Yorb   Edit links Article Talk English Read View source View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read View source View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons Wikiquote Wikisource From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia 
18 th Dynasty Egyptian pharaoh For other uses see Akhenaten disambiguation. Akhenaten Amenhotep IV Amenophis IV Naphurureya Ikhnaton12 Statue of Akhenaten at the Egyptian Museum Pharaoh Reign 13531336 BC3 13511334 BC4 Predecessor Amenhotep III Successor Smenkhkare Royal titulary Horus name Ka nakht qai shuti Year 155 Victorious bull high of plumes5 Mery Iten after Year 55 Beloved of the Aten5 Nebty name Wer nesyt em Ipet Swt Year 155 Great of kingship in Karnak5 WernesutemAkhetaten after Year 55 Great of kingship in Akhetaten5 Golden Horus Wetjes khau em Iunu shemay Year 155 Elevated of appearances in southern Heliopolis5 Wetjes ren en Iten after Year 55 Who has elevated the name of the Aten5 Prenomen Praenomen NeferkheperuRe waenRe Year 1175 The perfect one of the manifestations of Re the unique one of Re5 Nomen Imenhetepu netjer heqa Waset Year 155 Amun is satisfied god and ruler of Thebes5 AkhenIten after Year 55 The one who is beneficial to the Aten5 Consorts Nefertiti Kiya An unidentified sisterwife most likely Tadukhipa Unidentified daughters of atiya and BurnaBuriash II Children Smenkhkare Meritaten Meketaten Ankhesenamun Neferneferuaten Tasherit Neferneferure Setepenre Tutankhamun most likely Ankhesenpaaten Tasherit Meritaten Tasherit Father Amenhotep III Mother Tiye Died 1336 or 1334 BC Burial Royal Tomb of Akhenaten Amarna original tomb KV55 disputed 67 Monuments Akhetaten Gempaaten Religion Ancient Egyptian religion Atenism Dynasty 
18 th Dynasty of Egypt Akhenaten pronounced kntn8 also spelled Akhenaton3910 or Echnaton11 Ancient Egyptian njtn nyty pronounced u n jatj1213 meaning Effective for the Aten was an ancient Egyptian pharaoh reigning c.135313363 or 13511334 BC4 the tenth ruler of the Eighteenth Dynasty. Before the fifth year of his reign he was known as Amenhotep IV Ancient Egyptian jmntp meaning Amun is satisfied Hellenized as Amenophis IV. As a pharaoh Akhenaten is noted for abandoning traditional ancient Egyptian religion of polytheism and introducing Atenism or worship centered around Aten. The views of Egyptologists differ as to whether the religious policy was absolutely monotheistic or whether it was monolatristic syncretistic or henotheistic.1415 This culture shift away from traditional religion was reversed after his death. Akhenatens monuments were dismantled and hidden his statues were destroyed and his name excluded from lists of rulers compiled by later pharaohs.16 Traditional religious practice was gradually restored notably under his close successor Tutankhamun who changed his name from Tutankhaten early in his reign.17 When some dozen years later rulers without clear rights of succession from the Eighteenth Dynasty founded a new dynasty they discredited Akhenaten and his immediate successors and referred to Akhenaten as the enemy or that criminal in archival records.1819 Akhenaten was all but lost to history until the late
19 thcentury discovery of Amarna or Akhetaten the new capital city he built for the worship of Aten.20 Furthermore in 1907 a mummy that could be Akhenatens was unearthed from the tomb KV55 in the Valley of the Kings by Edward R. Ayrton. Genetic testing has determined that the man buried in KV55 was Tutankhamuns father21 but its identification as Akhenaten has since been questioned.67222324 Akhenatens rediscovery and Flinders Petries early excavations at Amarna sparked great public interest in the pharaoh and his queen Nefertiti. He has been described as enigmatic mysterious revolutionary the greatest idealist of the world and the first individual in history but also as a heretic fanatic possibly insane and mad.1425262728 Public and scholarly fascination with Akhenaten comes from his connection with Tutankhamun the unique style and high quality of the pictorial arts he patronized and the religion he attempted to establish foreshadowing monotheism. Family Akhenaten Nefertiti and their children See also Eighteenth Dynasty of Egypt family tree The future Akhenaten was born Amenhotep a younger son of pharaoh Amenhotep III and his principal wife Tiye. Akhenaten had an elder brother crown prince Thutmose who was recognized as Amenhotep IIIs heir. Akhenaten also had four or five sisters Sitamun Henuttaneb Iset Nebetah and possibly Beketaten.29 Thutmoses early death perhaps around Amenhotep IIIs thirtieth regnal year meant that Akhenaten was next in line for Egypts throne.30 Akhenaten was married to Nefertiti his Great Royal Wife. The exact timing of their marriage is unknown but inscriptions from the pharaohs building projects suggest that they married either shortly before or after Akhenaten took the throne.10 For example Egyptologist Dimitri Laboury suggests that the marriage took place in Akhenatens fourth regnal year.31 A secondary wife of Akhenaten named Kiya is also known from inscriptions. Some Egyptologists theorize that she gained her importance as the mother of Tutankhamun.32 William Murnane proposes that Kiya is the colloquial name of the Mitanni princess Tadukhipa daughter of the Mitanni king Tushratta who had married Amenhotep III before becoming the wife of Akhenaten.3334 Akhenatens other attested consorts are the daughter of the Eniasi ruler atiya and another daughter of the Babylonian king BurnaBuriash II.35 This limestone relief of a royal couple in the Amarna style has variously been attributed as Akhenaten and Nefertiti Smenkhkare and Meritaten or Tutankhamun and Ankhesenamun. Akhenaten could have had seven or eight children based on inscriptions. Egyptologists are fairly certain about his six daughters who are well attested in contemporary depictions.36 Among his six daughters Meritaten was born in regnal year one or five Meketaten in year four or six Ankhesenpaaten later queen of Tutankhamun before year five or eight Neferneferuaten Tasherit in year eight or nine Neferneferure in year nine or ten and Setepenre in year ten or eleven.37383940 Tutankhamun born Tutankhaten was most likely Akhenatens son with Nefertiti or another wife.4142 There is less certainty around Akhenatens relationship with Smenkhkare Akhenatens coregent or successor43 and husband to his daughter Meritaten he could have been Akhenatens eldest son with an unknown wife or Akhenatens younger brother.4445 Some historians such as Edward Wente and James Allen have proposed that Akhenaten took some of his daughters as wives or sexual consorts to father a male heir.4647 While this is debated some historical parallels exist Akhenatens father Amenhotep III married his daughter Sitamun while Ramesses II married two or more of his daughters even though their marriages might simply have been ceremonial.4849 In Akhenatens case his oldest daughter Meritaten is recorded as Great Royal Wife to Smenkhkare but is also listed on a box from Tutankhamuns tomb alongside pharaohs Akhenaten and Neferneferuaten as Great Royal Wife. Additionally letters written to Akhenaten from foreign rulers make reference to Meritaten as mistress of the house. Egyptologists in the early 
20 th century also believed that Akhenaten could have fathered a child with his second oldest daughter Meketaten. Meketatens death at perhaps age ten to twelve is recorded in the royal tombs at Akhetaten from around regnal years thirteen or fourteen. Early Egyptologists attribute her death to childbirth because of the depiction of an infant in her tomb. Because no husband is known for Meketaten the assumption had been that Akhenaten was the father. Aidan Dodson believes this to be unlikely as no Egyptian tomb has been found that mentions or alludes to the cause of death of the tomb owner. Further Jacobus van Dijk proposes that the child is a portrayal of Meketatens soul.50 Finally various monuments originally for Kiya were reinscribed for Akhenatens daughters Meritaten and Ankhesenpaaten. The revised inscriptions list a Meritatentasherit junior and an Ankhesenpaatentasherit. According to some this indicates that Akhenaten fathered his own grandchildren. Others hold that since these grandchildren are not attested to elsewhere they are fictions invented to fill the space originally portraying Kiyas child.4651 Early life Akhenatens elder brother Thutmose shown in his role as High Priest of Ptah. Akhenaten became heir to the throne after Thutmose died during their fathers reign. Egyptologists know very little about Akhenatens life as prince Amenhotep. Donald B. Redford dates his birth before his father Amenhotep IIIs 
25 th regnal year c.13631361 BC based on the birth of Akhenatens first daughter who was likely born fairly early in his own reign.452 The only mention of his name as the Kings Son Amenhotep was found on a wine docket at Amenhotep IIIs Malkata palace where some historians suggested Akhenaten was born. Others contend that he was born at Memphis where growing up he was influenced by the worship of the sun god Ra practiced at nearby Heliopolis.53 Redford and James K. Hoffmeier state however that Ras cult was so widespread and established throughout Egypt that Akhenaten could have been influenced by solar worship even if he did not grow up around Heliopolis.5455 Some historians have tried to determine who was Akhenatens tutor during his youth and have proposed scribes Heqareshu or Meryre II the royal tutor Amenemotep or the vizier Aperel.56 The only person who we know for certain served the prince was Parennefer whose tomb mentions this fact.57 Egyptologist Cyril Aldred suggests that prince Amenhotep might have been a High Priest of Ptah in Memphis although no evidence supporting this had been found.58 It is known that Amenhoteps brother crown prince Thutmose served in this role before he died. If Amenhotep inherited all his brothers roles in preparation for his accession to the throne he might have become a high priest in Thutmoses stead. Aldred proposes that Akhenatens unusual artistic inclinations might have been formed during his time serving Ptah the patron god of craftsmen whose high priests were sometimes referred to as The Greatest of the Directors of Craftsmanship.59 Reign Coregency with Amenhotep III There is much controversy around whether Amenhotep IV ascended to Egypts throne on the death of his father Amenhotep III or whether there was a coregency lasting perhaps as long as 12 years. Eric Cline Nicholas Reeves Peter Dorman and other scholars argue strongly against the establishment of a long coregency between the two rulers and in favor of either no coregency or one lasting at most two years.60 Donald B. Redford William J. Murnane Alan Gardiner and Lawrence Berman contest the view of any coregency whatsoever between Akhenaten and his father.6162 Most recently in 2014 archaeologists found both pharaohs names inscribed on the wall of the Luxor tomb of vizier AmenhotepHuy. The Egyptian Ministry of Antiquities called this conclusive evidence that Akhenaten shared power with his father for at least eight years based on the dating of the tomb.63 However this conclusion has since been called into question by other Egyptologists according to whom the inscription only means that construction on AmenhotepHuys tomb started during Amenhotep IIIs reign and ended under Akhenatens and AmenhotepHuy thus simply wanted to pay his respects to both rulers.64 Early reign as Amenhotep lV Wooden standing statue of Akhenaten. Currently in the Egyptian Museum of Berlin Akhenaten took Egypts throne as Amenhotep IV most likely in 135365 or 1351 BC.4 It is unknown how old Amenhotep IV was when he did this estimates range from 10 to 
23.6 6 He was most likely crowned in Thebes or less likely at Memphis or Armant.66 The beginning of Amenhotep IVs reign followed established pharaonic traditions. He did not immediately start redirecting worship toward the Aten and distancing himself from other gods. Egyptologist Donald B. Redford believes this implied that Amenhotep IVs eventual religious policies were not conceived of before his reign and he did not follow a preestablished plan or program. Redford points to three pieces of evidence to support this. First surviving inscriptions show Amenhotep IV worshipping several different gods including Atum Osiris Anubis Nekhbet Hathor67 and the Eye of Ra and texts from this era refer to the gods and every god and every goddess. The High Priest of Amun was also still active in the fourth year of Amenhotep IVs reign.68 Second even though he later moved his capital from Thebes to Akhetaten his initial royal titulary honored Thebeshis nomen was Amenhotep godruler of Thebesand recognizing its importance he called the city Southern Heliopolis the first great seat of Re or the Disc. Third Amenhotep IV did not yet destroy temples to the other gods and he even continued his fathers construction projects at Karnaks Precinct of AmunRe.69 He decorated the walls of the precincts Third Pylon with images of himself worshipping RaHorakhty portrayed in the gods traditional form of a falconheaded man.70 Artistic depictions continued unchanged early in Amenhotep IVs reign. Tombs built or completed in the first few years after he took the throne such as those of Kheruef Ramose and Parennefer show the pharaoh in the traditional artistic style.71 In Ramoses tomb Amenhotep IV appears on the west wall seated on a throne with Ramose appearing before the pharaoh. On the other side of the doorway Amenhotep IV and Nefertiti are shown in the window of appearances with the Aten depicted as the sun disc. In Parennefers tomb Amenhotep IV and Nefertiti are seated on a throne with the sun disc depicted over the pharaoh and his queen.71 While continuing the worship of other gods Amenhotep IVs initial building program sought to build new places of worship to the Aten. He ordered the construction of temples or shrines to the Aten in several cities across the country such as Bubastis Tell elBorg Heliopolis Memphis Nekhen Kawa and Kerma.72 He also ordered the construction of a large temple complex dedicated to the Aten at Karnak in Thebes northeast of the parts of the Karnak complex dedicated to Amun. The Aten temple complex collectively known as the Per Aten House of the Aten consisted of several temples whose names survive the Gempaaten The Aten is found in the estate of the Aten the Hwt Benben House or Temple of the Benben the RudMenu Enduring of monuments for Aten forever the TeniMenu Exalted are the monuments of the Aten forever and the Sekhen Aten booth of Aten.73 Around regnal year two or three Amenhotep IV organized a Sed festival. Sed festivals were ritual rejuvenations of an aging pharaoh which usually took place for the first time around the thirtieth year of a pharaohs reign and every three or so years thereafter. Egyptologists only speculate as to why Amenhotep IV organized a Sed festival when he was likely still in his early twenties. Some historians see it as evidence for Amenhotep III and Amenhotep IVs coregency and believed that Amenhotep IVs Sed festival coincided with one of his fathers celebrations. Others speculate that Amenhotep IV chose to hold his festival three years after his fathers death aiming to proclaim his rule a continuation of his fathers reign. Yet others believe that the festival was held to honor the Aten on whose behalf the pharaoh ruled Egypt or as Amenhotep III was considered to have become one with the Aten following his death the Sed festival honored both the pharaoh and the god at the same time. It is also possible that the purpose of the ceremony was to figuratively fill Amenhotep IV with strength before his great enterprise the introduction of the Aten cult and the founding of the new capital Akhetaten. Regardless of the celebrations aim Egyptologists believe that during the festivities Amenhotep IV only made offerings to the Aten rather than the many gods and goddesses as was customary.597475 Name change Among the last documents that refer to Akhenaten as Amenhotep IV are two copies of a letter to the pharaoh from Ipy the high steward of Memphis. These letters found in Gurob and informing the pharaoh that the royal estates in Memphis are in good order and the temple of Ptah is prosperous and flourishing are dated to regnal year five day nineteen of the growing seasons third month. About a month later day thirteen of the growing seasons fourth month one of the boundary stela at Akhetaten already had the name Akhenaten carved on it implying that the pharaoh changed his name between the two inscriptions.76777879 Amenhotep IV changed his royal titulary to show his devotion to the Aten. No longer would he be known as Amenhotep IV and be associated with the god Amun but rather he would completely shift his focus to the Aten. Egyptologists debate the exact meaning of Akhenaten his new personal name. The word akh Ancient Egyptian  could have different translations such as satisfied effective spirit or serviceable to and thus Akhenatens name could be translated to mean Aten is satisfied Effective spirit of the Aten or Serviceable to the Aten respectively.80 Gertie Englund and Florence Friedman arrive at the translation Effective for the Aten by analyzing contemporary texts and inscriptions in which Akhenaten often described himself as being effective for the sun disc. Englund and Friedman conclude that the frequency with which Akhenaten used this term likely means that his own name meant Effective for the Aten.80 Some historians such as William F. Albright Edel Elmar and Gerhard Fecht propose that Akhenatens name is misspelled and mispronounced. These historians believe Aten should rather be Jti thus rendering the pharaohs name Akhenjti or Aanjti pronounced knjt as it could have been pronounced in Ancient Egypt.818283 Amenhotep IV Akhenaten Horus name KanakhtqaiShuti Strong Bull of the Double Plumes Meryaten Beloved of Aten Nebty name WernesutemIpetswt Great of Kingship in Karnak WernesutemAkhetaten Great of Kingship in AkhetAten Golden Horus name WetjeskhauemIunuShemay Crowned in Heliopolis of the South Thebes WetjesrenenAten Exalter of the Name of Aten Prenomen Neferkheperurewaenre Beautiful are the Forms of Re the Unique one of Re Nomen Amenhotep NetjerHeqaWaset Amun is Satisfied Divine Lord of Thebes Akhenaten Effective for the Aten Founding Amarna One of the stele marking the boundary of the new capital Akhetaten Main article Amarna Around the same time he changed his royal titulary on the thirteenth day of the growing seasons fourth month Akhenaten decreed that a new capital city be built Akhetaten Ancient Egyptian tjtn meaning Horizon of the Aten better known today as Amarna. The events Egyptologists know the most about during Akhenatens life are connected with founding Akhetaten as several socalled boundary stelae were found around the city to mark its boundary.84 The pharaoh chose a site about halfway between Thebes the capital at the time and Memphis on the east bank of the Nile where a wadi and a natural dip in the surrounding cliffs form a silhouette similar to the horizon hieroglyph. Additionally the site had previously been uninhabited. According to inscriptions on one boundary stela the site was appropriate for Atens city for not being the property of a god nor being the property of a goddess nor being the property of a ruler nor being the property of a female ruler nor being the property of any people able to lay claim to it.85 Historians do not know for certain why Akhenaten established a new capital and left Thebes the old capital. The boundary stelae detailing Akhetatens founding is damaged where it likely explained the pharaohs motives for the move. Surviving parts claim what happened to Akhenaten was worse than those that I heard previously in his reign and worse than those heard by any kings who assumed the White Crown and alludes to offensive speech against the Aten. Egyptologists believe that Akhenaten could be referring to conflict with the priesthood and followers of Amun the patron god of Thebes. The great temples of Amun such as Karnak were all located in Thebes and the priests there achieved significant power earlier in the Eighteenth Dynasty especially under Hatshepsut and Thutmose III thanks to pharaohs offering large amounts of Egypts growing wealth to the cult of Amun historians such as Donald B. Redford therefore posited that by moving to a new capital Akhenaten may have been trying to break with Amuns priests and the god.868788 Talatat blocks from Akhenatens Aten temple in Karnak Akhetaten was a planned city with the Great Temple of the Aten Small Aten Temple royal residences records office and government buildings in the city center. Some of these buildings such as the Aten temples were ordered to be built by Akhenaten on the boundary stela decreeing the citys founding.878990 The city was built quickly thanks to a new construction method that used substantially smaller building blocks than under previous pharaohs. These blocks called talatats measured 12 by 12 by 1 ancient Egyptian cubits c.27 by 27 by 54 cm and because of the smaller weight and standardized size using them during constructions was more efficient than using heavy building blocks of varying sizes.9192 By regnal year eight Akhetaten reached a state where it could be occupied by the royal family. Only his most loyal subjects followed Akhenaten and his family to the new city. While the city continued to be built in years five through eight construction work began to stop in Thebes. The Theban Aten temples that had begun were abandoned and a village of those working on Valley of the Kings tombs was relocated to the workers village at Akhetaten. However construction work continued in the rest of the country as larger cult centers such as Heliopolis and Memphis also had temples built for Aten.9394 International relations Amarna letter EA 362 titled A Commissioner Murdered. In this letter RibHadda of Byblos informs the pharaoh of the death of Pawura an Egyptian commissioner. Painted limestone miniature stela. It shows Akhenaten standing before 2 incense stands Aten disc above. From Amarna Egypt  
18 th Dynasty. The Petrie Museum of Egyptian Archaeology London Head of Akhenaten Further information Amarna letters The Amarna letters have provided important evidence about Akhenatens reign and foreign policy. The letters are a cache of 382 diplomatic texts and literary and educational materials discovered between 1887 and 197995 and named after Amarna the modern name for Akhenatens capital Akhetaten. The diplomatic correspondence comprises clay tablet messages between Amenhotep III Akhenaten and Tutankhamun various subjects through Egyptian military outposts rulers of vassal states and the foreign rulers of Babylonia Assyria Syria Canaan Alashiya Arzawa Mitanni and the Hittites.96 The Amarna letters portray the international situation in the Eastern Mediterranean that Akhenaten inherited from his predecessors. In the 200 years preceding Akhenatens reign following the expulsion of the Hyksos from Lower Egypt at the end of the Second Intermediate Period the kingdoms influence and military might increased greatly. Egypts power reached new heights under Thutmose III who ruled approximately 100 years before Akhenaten and led several successful military campaigns into Nubia and Syria. Egypts expansion led to confrontation with the Mitanni but this rivalry ended with the two nations becoming allies. Slowly however Egypts power started to wane. Amenhotep III aimed to maintain the balance of power through marriagessuch as his marriage to Tadukhipa daughter of the Mitanni king Tushrattaand vassal states. Under Amenhotep III and Akhenaten Egypt was unable or unwilling to oppose the rise of the Hittites around Syria. The pharaohs seemed to eschew military confrontation at a time when the balance of power between Egypts neighbors and rivals was shifting and the Hittites a confrontational state overtook the Mitanni in influence.979899100 Early in his reign Akhenaten was evidently concerned about the expanding power of the Hittite Empire under uppiluliuma I. A successful Hittite attack on Mitanni and its ruler Tushratta would have disrupted the entire international balance of power in the Ancient Middle East at a time when Egypt had made peace with Mitanni this would cause some of Egypts vassals to switch their allegiances to the Hittites as time would prove. A group of Egypts allies who attempted to rebel against the Hittites were captured and wrote letters begging Akhenaten for troops but he did not respond to most of their pleas. Evidence suggests that the troubles on the northern frontier led to difficulties in Canaan particularly in a struggle for power between Labaya of Shechem and AbdiHeba of Jerusalem which required the pharaoh to intervene in the area by dispatching Medjay troops northwards. Akhenaten pointedly refused to save his vassal RibHadda of Bybloswhose kingdom was being besieged by the expanding state of Amurru under AbdiAshirta and later Aziru son of AbdiAshirtadespite RibHaddas numerous pleas for help from the pharaoh. RibHadda wrote a total of 60 letters to Akhenaten pleading for aid from the pharaoh. Akhenaten wearied of RibHaddas constant correspondences and once told RibHadda You are the one that writes to me more than all the other mayors or Egyptian vassals in EA 1
24.1 01 What RibHadda did not comprehend was that the Egyptian king would not organize and dispatch an entire army north just to preserve the political status quo of several minor city states on the fringes of Egypts Asiatic Empire.102 RibHadda would pay the ultimate price his exile from Byblos due to a coup led by his brother Ilirabih is mentioned in one letter. When RibHadda appealed in vain for aid from Akhenaten and then turned to Aziru his sworn enemy to place him back on the throne of his city Aziru promptly had him dispatched to the king of Sidon where RibHadda was almost certainly executed.103 In a view discounted by the 
21 st century104 several Egyptologists in the late 
19 th and 
20 th centuries interpreted the Amarna letters to mean that Akhenaten was a pacifist who neglected foreign policy and Egypts foreign territories in favor of his internal reforms. For example Henry Hall believed Akhenaten succeeded by his obstinate doctrinaire love of peace in causing far more misery in his world than half a dozen elderly militarists could have done105 while James Henry Breasted said Akhenaten was not fit to cope with a situation demanding an aggressive man of affairs and a skilled military leader.106 Others noted that the Amarna letters counter the conventional view that Akhenaten neglected Egypts foreign territories in favour of his internal reforms. For instance Norman de Garis Davies praised Akhenatens emphasis on diplomacy over war while James Baikie said that the fact that there is no evidence of revolt within the borders of Egypt itself during the whole reign is surely ample proof that there was no such abandonment of his royal duties on the part of Akhenaten as has been assumed.107108 Indeed several letters from Egyptian vassals notified the pharaoh that they have followed his instructions implying that the pharaoh sent such instructions.109 The Amarna letters also show that vassal states were told repeatedly to expect the arrival of the Egyptian military on their lands and provide evidence that these troops were dispatched and arrived at their destination. Dozens of letters detail that Akhenatenand Amenhotep IIIsent Egyptian and Nubian troops armies archers chariots horses and ships.110 Only one military campaign is known for certain under Akhenatens reign. In his second or twelfth year111 Akhenaten ordered his Viceroy of Kush Tuthmose to lead a military expedition to quell a rebellion and raids on settlements on the Nile by Nubian nomadic tribes. The victory was commemorated on two stelae one discovered at Amada and another at Buhen. Egyptologists differ on the size of the campaign Wolfgang Helck considered it a smallscale police operation while Alan Schulman considered it a war of major proportions.112113114 Other Egyptologists suggested that Akhenaten could have waged war in Syria or the Levant possibly against the Hittites. Cyril Aldred based on Amarna letters describing Egyptian troop movements proposed that Akhenaten launched an unsuccessful war around the city of Gezer while Marc Gabolde argued for an unsuccessful campaign around Kadesh. Either of these could be the campaign referred to on Tutankhamuns Restoration Stela if an army was sent to Djahy southern Canaan and Syria to broaden the boundaries of Egypt no success of their cause came to pass.115116117 John Coleman Darnell and Colleen Manassa also argued that Akhenaten fought with the Hittites for control of Kadesh but was unsuccessful the city was not recaptured until 6070 years later under Seti I.118 Overall archeological evidence suggests that Akhenaten paid close attention to the affairs of Egyptian vassals in Canaan and Syria though primarily not through letters such as those found at Amarna but through reports from government officials and agents. Akhenaten managed to preserve Egypts control over the core of its Near Eastern Empire which consisted of presentday Israel as well as the Phoenician coast while avoiding conflict with the increasingly powerful and aggressive Hittite Empire of uppiluliuma I which overtook the Mitanni as the dominant power in the northern part of the region. Only the Egyptian border province of Amurru in Syria around the Orontes River was lost to the Hittites when its ruler Aziru defected to the Hittites ordered by Akhenaten to come to Egypt Aziru was released after promising to stay loyal to the pharaoh nonetheless turning to the Hittites soon after his release.119 Later years In regnal year twelve Akhenaten received tributes and offerings from allied countries and vassal states at Akhetaten as depicted in the tomb of Meryra II. Egyptologists know little about the last five years of Akhenatens reign beginning in c.13413 or 1339 BC.4 These years are poorly attested and only a few pieces of contemporary evidence survive the lack of clarity makes reconstructing the latter part of the pharaohs reign a daunting task and a controversial and contested topic of discussion among Egyptologists.120 Among the newest pieces of evidence is an inscription discovered in 2012 at a limestone quarry in Deir elBersha just north of Akhetaten from the pharaohs sixteenth regnal year. The text refers to a building project in Amarna and establishes that Akhenaten and Nefertiti were still a royal couple just a year before Akhenatens death.121122123 The inscription is dated to Year 16 month 3 of Akhet day 15 of the reign of Akhenaten.121 Before the 2012 discovery of the Deir elBersha inscription the last known fixeddate event in Akhenatens reign was a royal reception in regnal year twelve in which the pharaoh and the royal family received tributes and offerings from allied countries and vassal states at Akhetaten. Inscriptions show tributes from Nubia the Land of Punt Syria the Kingdom of Hattusa the islands in the Mediterranean Sea and Libya. Egyptologists such as Aidan Dodson consider this year twelve celebration to be the zenith of Akhenatens reign.124 Thanks to reliefs in the tomb of courtier Meryre II historians know that the royal family Akhenaten Nefertiti and their six daughters were present at the royal reception in full.124 However historians are uncertain about the reasons for the reception. Possibilities include the celebration of the marriage of future pharaoh Ay to Tey celebration of Akhenatens twelve years on the throne the summons of king Aziru of Amurru to Egypt a military victory at Sumur in the Levant a successful military campaign in Nubia125 Nefertitis ascendancy to the throne as coregent or the completion of the new capital city Akhetaten.126 Following year twelve Donald B. Redford and other Egyptologists proposed that Egypt was struck by an epidemic most likely a plague.127 Contemporary evidence suggests that a plague ravaged through the Middle East around this time128 and ambassadors and delegations arriving to Akhenatens year twelve reception might have brought the disease to Egypt.129 Alternatively letters from the Hattians might suggest that the epidemic originated in Egypt and was carried throughout the Middle East by Egyptian prisoners of war.130 Regardless of its origin the epidemic might account for several deaths in the royal family that occurred in the last five years of Akhenatens reign including those of his daughters Meketaten Neferneferure and Setepenre.131132 Coregency with Smenkhkare or Nefertiti Akhenaten could have ruled together with Smenkhkare and Nefertiti for several years before his death.133134 Based on depictions and artifacts from the tombs of Meryre II and Tutankhamun Smenkhkare could have been Akhenatens coregent by regnal year thirteen or fourteen but died a year or two later. Nefertiti might not have assumed the role of coregent until after year sixteen when a stela still mentions her as Akhenatens Great Royal Wife. While Nefertitis familial relationship with Akhenaten is known whether Akhenaten and Smenkhkare were related by blood is unclear. Smenkhkare could have been Akhenatens son or brother as the son of Amenhotep III with Tiye or Sitamun.135 Archaeological evidence makes it clear however that Smenkhkare was married to Meritaten Akhenatens eldest daughter.136 For another the socalled Coregency Stela found in a tomb at Akhetaten might show queen Nefertiti as Akhenatens coregent but this is uncertain as the stela was recarved to show the names of Ankhesenpaaten and Neferneferuaten.137 Egyptologist Aidan Dodson proposed that both Smenkhkare and Neferiti were Akhenatens coregents to ensure the Amarna familys continued rule when Egypt was confronted with an epidemic. Dodson suggested that the two were chosen to rule as Tutankhatens coregent in case Akhenaten died and Tutankhaten took the throne at a young age or rule in Tutankhatens stead if the prince also died in the epidemic.43 Death and burial Further information Amarna succession and KV55 Akhenatens sarcophagus reconstituted from pieces discovered in his original tomb in Amarna now in the Egyptian Museum Cairo. The desecrated royal coffin found in Tomb KV55 Akhenaten died after seventeen years of rule and was initially buried in a tomb in the Royal Wadi east of Akhetaten. The order to construct the tomb and to bury the pharaoh there was commemorated on one of the boundary stela delineating the capitals borders Let a tomb be made for me in the eastern mountain of Akhetaten. Let my burial be made in it in the millions of jubilees which the Aten my father decreed for me.138 In the years following the burial Akhenatens sarcophagus was destroyed and left in the Akhetaten necropolis reconstructed in the 
20 th century it is in the Egyptian Museum in Cairo as of 20
19.1 39 Despite leaving the sarcophagus behind Akhenatens mummy was removed from the royal tombs after Tutankhamun abandoned Akhetaten and returned to Thebes. It was most likely moved to tomb KV55 in Valley of the Kings near Thebes.140141 This tomb was later desecrated likely during the Ramesside period.142143 Whether Smenkhkare also enjoyed a brief independent reign after Akhenaten is unclear.144 If Smenkhkare outlived Akhenaten and became sole pharaoh he likely ruled Egypt for less than a year. The next successor was Nefertiti145 or Meritaten146 ruling as Neferneferuaten reigning in Egypt for about two years.147 She was in turn probably succeeded by Tutankhaten with the country being administered by the vizier and future pharaoh Ay.148 Profile view of the skull thought to be Akhenaten recovered from KV55 While Akhenatenalong with Smenkhkarewas most likely reburied in tomb KV55149 the identification of the mummy found in that tomb as Akhenaten remains controversial to this day. The mummy has repeatedly been examined since its discovery in 1907. Most recently Egyptologist Zahi Hawass led a team of researchers to examine the mummy using medical and DNA analysis with the results published in 2010. In releasing their test results Hawasss team identified the mummy as the father of Tutankhamun and thus most probably Akhenaten.150 However the studys validity has since been called into question.67151152153 For instance the discussion of the study results does not discuss that Tutankhamuns father and the fathers siblings would share some genetic markers if Tutankhamuns father was Akhenaten the DNA results could indicate that the mummy is a brother of Akhenaten possibly Smenkhkare.153154 Legacy With Akhenatens death the Aten cult he had founded fell out of favor at first gradually and then with decisive finality. Tutankhaten changed his name to Tutankhamun in Year 2 of his reign c.1332 BC and abandoned the city of Akhetaten.155 Their successors then attempted to erase Akhenaten and his family from the historical record. During the reign of Horemheb the last pharaoh of the Eighteenth Dynasty and the first pharaoh after Akhenaten who was not related to Akhenatens family Egyptians started to destroy temples to the Aten and reuse the building blocks in new construction projects including in temples for the newly restored god Amun. Horemhebs successor continued in this effort. Seti I restored monuments to Amun and had the gods name recarved on inscriptions where it was removed by Akhenaten. Seti I also ordered that Akhenaten Smenkhkare Neferneferuaten Tutankhamun and Ay be excised from official lists of pharaohs to make it appear that Amenhotep III was immediately succeeded by Horemheb. Under the Ramessides who succeeded Seti I Akhetaten was gradually destroyed and the building material reused across the country such as in constructions at Hermopolis. The negative attitudes toward Akhenaten were illustrated by for example inscriptions in the tomb of scribe Mose or Mes where Akhenatens reign is referred to as the time of the enemy of AkhetAten.156157158 Some Egyptologists such as Jacobus van Dijk and Jan Assmann believe that Akhenatens reign and the Amarna period started a gradual decline in the Egyptian governments power and the pharaohs standing in Egyptians society and religious life.159160 Akhenatens religious reforms subverted the relationship ordinary Egyptians had with their gods and their pharaoh as well as the role the pharaoh played in the relationship between the people and the gods. Before the Amarna period the pharaoh was the representative of the gods on Earth the son of the god Ra and the living incarnation of the god Horus and maintained the divine order through rituals and offerings and by sustaining the temples of the gods.161 Additionally even though the pharaoh oversaw all religious activity Egyptians could access their gods through regular public holidays festivals and processions. This led to a seemingly close connection between people and the gods especially the patron deity of their respective towns and cities.162 Akhenaten however banned the worship of gods beside the Aten including through festivals. He also declared himself to be the only one who could worship the Aten and required that all religious devotion previously exhibited toward the gods be directed toward himself. After the Amarna period during the Nineteenth and Twentieth Dynastiesc.270 years following Akhenatens deaththe relationship between the people the pharaoh and the gods did not simply revert to preAmarna practices and beliefs. The worship of all gods returned but the relationship between the gods and the worshipers became more direct and personal163 circumventing the pharaoh. Rather than acting through the pharaoh Egyptians started to believe that the gods intervened directly in their lives protecting the pious and punishing criminals.164 The gods replaced the pharaoh as their own representatives on Earth. The god Amun once again became king among all gods.165 According to van Dijk the king was no longer a god but god himself had become king. Once Amun had been recognized as the true king the political power of the earthly rulers could be reduced to a minimum.166 Consequently the influence and power of the Amun priesthood continued to grow until the Twentyfirst Dynasty c.1077 BC by which time the High Priests of Amun effectively became rulers over parts of Egypt.160167168 Akhenatens reforms also had a longerterm impact on Ancient Egyptian language and hastened the spread of the spoken Late Egyptian language in official writings and speeches. Spoken and written Egyptian diverged early on in Egyptian history and stayed different over time.169 During the Amarna period however royal and religious texts and inscriptions including the boundary stelae at Akhetaten or the Amarna letters started to regularly include more vernacular linguistic elements such as the definite article or a new possessive form. Even though they continued to diverge these changes brought the spoken and written language closer to one another more systematically than under previous pharaohs of the New Kingdom. While Akhenatens successors attempted to erase his religious artistic and even linguistic changes from history the new linguistic elements remained a more common part of official texts following the Amarna years starting with the Nineteenth Dynasty.170171172 Akhenaten is also recognized as a Prophet in the Druze faith.173174 Atenism Further information Atenism and Aten Relief fragment showing a royal head probably Akhenaten and early Aten cartouches. Aten extends Ankh sign of life to the figure. Reign of Akhenaten. From Amarna Egypt. The Petrie Museum of Egyptian Archaeology London Pharaoh Akhenaten center and his family worshiping the Aten with characteristic rays seen emanating from the solar disk. Later such imagery was prohibited. Egyptians worshipped a sun god under several names and solar worship had been growing in popularity even before Akhenaten especially during the Eighteenth Dynasty and the reign of Amenhotep III Akhenatens father.175 During the New Kingdom the pharaoh started to be associated with the sun disc for example one inscription called the pharaoh Hatshepsut the female Re shining like the Disc while Amenhotep III was described as he who rises over every foreign land Nebmare the dazzling disc.176 During the Eighteenth Dynasty a religious hymn to the sun also appeared and became popular among Egyptians.177 However Egyptologists question whether there is a causal relationship between the cult of the sun disc before Akhenaten and Akhenatens religious policies.177 Implementation and development The implementation of Atenism can be traced through gradual changes in the Atens iconography and Egyptologist Donald B. Redford divided its development into three stagesearliest intermediate and finalin his studies of Akhenaten and Atenism. The earliest stage was associated with a growing number of depictions of the sun disc though the disc is still seen resting on the head of the falconheaded sun god RaHorakhty as the god was traditionally represented.178 The god was only unique but not exclusive.179 The intermediate stage was marked by the elevation of the Aten above other gods and the appearance of cartouches around his inscribed namecartouches traditionally indicating that the enclosed text is a royal name. The final stage had the Aten represented as a sun disc with sunrays like long arms terminating in human hands and the introduction of a new epithet for the god the great living Disc which is in jubilee lord of heaven and earth.180 In the early years of his reign Amenhotep IV lived at Thebes the old capital city and permitted worship of Egypts traditional deities to continue. However some signs already pointed to the growing importance of the Aten. For example inscriptions in the Theban tomb of Parennefer from the early rule of Amenhotep IV state that one measures the payments to every other god with a level measure but for the Aten one measures so that it overflows indicating a more favorable attitude to the cult of Aten than the other gods.179 Additionally near the Temple of Karnak AmunRas great cult center Amenhotep IV erected several massive buildings including temples to the Aten. The new Aten temples had no roof and the god was thus worshipped in the sunlight under the open sky rather than in dark temple enclosures as had been the previous custom.181182 The Theban buildings were later dismantled by his successors and used as infill for new constructions in the Temple of Karnak when they were later dismantled by archaeologists some 36000 decorated blocks from the original Aten building here were revealed that preserve many elements of the original relief scenes and inscriptions.183 One of the most important turning points in the early reign of Amenhotep IV is a speech given by the pharaoh at the beginning of his second regnal year. A copy of the speech survives on one of the pylons at the Karnak Temple Complex near Thebes. Speaking to the royal court scribes or the people Amenhotep IV said that the gods were ineffective and had ceased their movements and that their temples had collapsed. The pharaoh contrasted this with the only remaining god the sun disc Aten who continued to move and exist forever. Some Egyptologists such as Donald B. Redford compared this speech to a proclamation or manifesto which foreshadowed and explained the pharaohs later religious reforms centered around the Aten.184185186 In his speech Akhenaten said The temples of the gods fallen to ruin their bodies do not endure. Since the time of the ancestors it is the wise man that knows these things. Behold I the king am speaking so that I might inform you concerning the appearances of the gods. I know their temples and I am versed in the writings specifically the inventory of their primeval bodies. And I have watched as they the gods have ceased their appearances one after the other. All of them have stopped except the god who gave birth to himself. And no one knows the mystery of how he performs his tasks. This god goes where he pleases and no one else knows his going. I approach him the things which he has made. How exalted they are.187 Akhenaten depicted as a sphinx at Amarna. In Year Five of his reign Amenhotep IV took decisive steps to establish the Aten as the sole god of Egypt. The pharaoh disbanded the priesthoods of all the other gods ... and diverted the income from these other cults to support the Aten. To emphasize his complete allegiance to the Aten the king officially changed his name from Amenhotep IV to Akhenaten Ancient Egyptian njtn meaning Effective for the Aten.183 Meanwhile the Aten was becoming a king itself. Artists started to depict him with the trappings of pharaohs placing his name in cartouchesa rare but not unique occurrence as the names of RaHorakhty and AmunRa had also been found enclosed in cartouchesand wearing a uraeus a symbol of kingship.188 The Aten may also have been the subject of Akhenatens royal Sed festival early in the pharaohs reign.189 With Aten becoming a sole deity Akhenaten started to proclaim himself as the only intermediary between Aten and his people and the subject of their personal worship and attention1
90 a feature not unheard of in Egyptian history with Fifth Dynasty pharaohs such as Nyuserre Ini proclaiming to be sole intermediaries between the people and the gods Osiris and Ra.191 Inscribed limestone fragment showing early Aten cartouches the Living Ra Horakhty. Reign of Akhenaten. From Amarna Egypt. The Petrie Museum of Egyptian Archaeology London Fragment of a stela showing parts of 3 late cartouches of Aten. There is a rare intermediate form of gods name. Reign of Akhenaten. From Amarna Egypt. The Petrie Museum of Egyptian Archaeology London By Year Nine of his reign Akhenaten declared that Aten was not merely the supreme god but the only worshipable god. He ordered the defacing of Amuns temples throughout Egypt and in a number of instances inscriptions of the plural gods were also removed.192193 This emphasized the changes encouraged by the new regime which included a ban on images with the exception of a rayed solar disc in which the rays appear to represent the unseen spirit of Aten who by then was evidently considered not merely a sun god but rather a universal deity. All life on Earth depended on the Aten and the visible sunlight.194195 Representations of the Aten were always accompanied with a sort of hieroglyphic footnote stating that the representation of the sun as allencompassing creator was to be taken as just that a representation of something that by its very nature as something transcending creation cannot be fully or adequately represented by any one part of that creation.196 Atens name was also written differently starting as early as Year Eight or as late as Year Fourteen according to some historians.197 From Living ReHorakhty who rejoices in the horizon in his name ShuRe who is in Aten the gods name changed to Living Re ruler of the horizon who rejoices in his name of Re the father who has returned as Aten removing the Atens connection to ReHorakhty and Shu two other solar deities.198 The Aten thus became an amalgamation that incorporated the attributes and beliefs around ReHorakhty universal sun god and Shu god of the sky and manifestation of the sunlight.199 Siliceous limestone fragment of a statue. There are late Aten cartouches on the draped right shoulder. Reign of Akhenaten. From Amarna Egypt. The Petrie Museum of Egyptian Archaeology London Akhenatens Atenist beliefs are best distilled in the Great Hymn to the Aten.200 The hymn was discovered in the tomb of Ay one of Akhenatens successors though Egyptologists believe that it could have been composed by Akhenaten himself.201202 The hymn celebrates the sun and daylight and recounts the dangers that abound when the sun sets. It tells of the Aten as a sole god and the creator of all life who recreates life every day at sunrise and on whom everything on Earth depends including the natural world peoples lives and even trade and commerce.203 In one passage the hymn declares O Sole God beside whom there is none You made the earth as you wished you alone.204 The hymn also states that Akhenaten is the only intermediary between the god and Egyptians and the only one who can understand the Aten You are in my heart and there is none who knows you except your son.205 Atenism and other gods Some debate has focused on the extent to which Akhenaten forced his religious reforms on his people.206 Certainly as time drew on he revised the names of the Aten and other religious language to increasingly exclude references to other gods at some point also he embarked on the widescale erasure of traditional gods names especially those of Amun.207 Some of his court changed their names to remove them from the patronage of other gods and place them under that of Aten or Ra with whom Akhenaten equated the Aten. Yet even at Amarna itself some courtiers kept such names as Ahmose child of the moon god the owner of tomb 3 and the sculptors workshop where the famous Nefertiti Bust and other works of royal portraiture were found is associated with an artist known to have been called Thutmose child of Thoth. An overwhelmingly large number of faience amulets at Amarna also show that talismans of the householdandchildbirth gods Bes and Taweret the eye of Horus and amulets of other traditional deities were openly worn by its citizens. Indeed a cache of royal jewelry found buried near the Amarna royal tombs now in the National Museum of Scotland includes a finger ring referring to Mut the wife of Amun. Such evidence suggests that though Akhenaten shifted funding away from traditional temples his policies were fairly tolerant until some point perhaps a particular event as yet unknown toward the end of the reign.208 Archaeological discoveries at Akhetaten show that many ordinary residents of this city chose to gouge or chisel out all references to the god Amun on even minor personal items that they owned such as commemorative scarabs or makeup pots perhaps for fear of being accused of having Amunist sympathies. References to Amenhotep III Akhenatens father were partly erased since they contained the traditional Amun form of his name Nebmaatre Amunhotep.209 After Akhenaten Following Akhenatens death Egypt gradually returned to its traditional polytheistic religion partly because of how closely associated the Aten became with Akhenaten.210 Atenism likely stayed dominant through the reigns of Akhenatens immediate successors Smenkhkare and Neferneferuaten as well as early in the reign of Tutankhaten.211 For some years the worship of Aten and a resurgent worship of Amun coexisted.212213 Over time however Akhenatens successors starting with Tutankhaten took steps to distance themselves from Atenism. Tutankhaten and his wife Ankhesenpaaten dropped the Aten from their names and changed them to Tutankhamun and Ankhesenamun respectively. Amun was restored as the supreme deity. Tutankhamun reestablished the temples of the other gods as the pharaoh propagated on his Restoration Stela He reorganized this land restoring its customs to those of the time of Re. ... He renewed the gods mansions and fashioned all their images. ... He raised up their temples and created their statues. ... When he had sought out the gods precincts which were in ruins in this land he refounded them just as they had been since the time of the first primeval age.214 Additionally Tutankhamuns building projects at Thebes and Karnak used talatats from Akhenatens buildings which implies that Tutankhamun might have started to demolish temples dedicated to the Aten. Aten temples continued to be torn down under Ay and Horemheb Tutankhamuns successors and the last pharaohs of the Eighteenth Dynasty. Horemheb might also have ordered the demolition of Akhetaten Akhenatens capital city.215 Further underlining the break with Aten worship Horemheb claimed to have been chosen to rule by the god Horus. Finally Seti I the second pharaoh of the Nineteenth Dynasty ordered the name of Amun to be restored on inscriptions where it had been removed or replaced by Aten.216 Artistic depictions Further information Amarna art Akhenaten in the typical Amarna period style. Statue of Akhenaten in the collection of the Egyptian Museum Cairo. Styles of art that flourished during the reigns of Akhenaten and his immediate successors known as Amarna art are markedly different from the traditional art of ancient Egypt. Representations are more realistic expressionistic and naturalistic217218 especially in depictions of animals plants and people and convey more action and movement for both nonroyal and royal individuals than the traditionally static representations. In traditional art a pharaohs divine nature was expressed by repose even immobility.219220221 The portrayals of Akhenaten himself greatly differ from the depictions of other pharaohs. Traditionally the portrayal of pharaohsand the Egyptian ruling classwas idealized and they were shown in stereotypically beautiful fashion as youthful and athletic.222 However Akhenatens portrayals are unconventional and unflattering with a sagging stomach broad hips thin legs thick thighs large almost feminine breasts a thin exaggeratedly long face and thick lips.223 Based on Akhenatens and his familys unusual artistic representations including potential depictions of gynecomastia and androgyny some have argued that the pharaoh and his family have either had aromatase excess syndrome and sagittal craniosynostosis syndrome or AntleyBixler syndrome.224 In 2010 results published from genetic studies on Akhenatens purported mummy did not find signs of gynecomastia or AntleyBixler syndrome21 although these results have since been questioned.225 Arguing instead for a symbolic interpretation Dominic Montserrat in Akhenaten History Fantasy and Ancient Egypt states that there is now a broad consensus among Egyptologists that the exaggerated forms of Akhenatens physical portrayal... are not to be read literally.209226 Because the god Aten was referred to as the mother and father of all humankind Montserrat and others suggest that Akhenaten was made to look androgynous in artwork as a symbol of the androgyny of the Aten.227 This required a symbolic gathering of all the attributes of the creator god into the physical body of the king himself which will display on earth the Atens multiple lifegiving functions.226 Akhenaten claimed the title The Unique One of Re and he may have directed his artists to contrast him with the common people through a radical departure from the idealized traditional pharaoh image.226 Depictions of other members of the court especially members of the royal family are also exaggerated stylized and overall different from traditional art.219 Significantly and for the only time in the history of Egyptian royal art the pharaohs family life is depicted the royal family is shown midaction in relaxed casual and intimate situations taking part in decidedly naturalistic activities showing affection for each other such as holding hands and kissing.228229230231 Small statue of Akhenaten wearing the Blue Crown Nefertiti also appears both beside the king and alone or with her daughters in actions usually reserved for a pharaoh such as smiting the enemy a traditional depiction of male pharaohs.232 This suggests that she enjoyed unusual status for a queen. Early artistic representations of her tend to be indistinguishable from her husbands except by her regalia but soon after the move to the new capital Nefertiti begins to be depicted with features specific to her. Questions remain whether the beauty of Nefertiti is portraiture or idealism.233 Speculative theories Sculptors trial piece of Akhenaten. Akhenatens status as a religious revolutionary has led to much speculation ranging from scholarly hypotheses to nonacademic fringe theories. Although some believe the religion he introduced was mostly monotheistic many others see Akhenaten as a practitioner of an Aten monolatry234 as he did not actively deny the existence of other gods he simply refrained from worshiping any but the Aten. Akhenaten and monotheism in Abrahamic religions The idea that Akhenaten was the pioneer of a monotheistic religion that later became Judaism has been considered by various scholars.235236237238239 One of the first to mention this was Sigmund Freud the founder of psychoanalysis in his book Moses and Monotheism.235 Basing his arguments on his belief that the Exodus story was historical Freud argued that Moses had been an Atenist priest who was forced to leave Egypt with his followers after Akhenatens death. Freud argued that Akhenaten was striving to promote monotheism something that the biblical Moses was able to achieve.235 Following the publication of his book the concept entered popular consciousness and serious research.240241 Freud commented on the connection between Adonai the Egyptian Aten and the Syrian divine name of Adonis as stemming from a common root235 in this he was following the argument of Egyptologist Arthur Weigall. Jan Assmanns opinion is that Aten and Adonai are not linguistically related.242 There are strong similarities between Akhenatens Great Hymn to the Aten and the Biblical Psalm 104 but there is debate as to relationship implied by this similarity.243244 Others have likened some aspects of Akhenatens relationship with the Aten to the relationship in Christian tradition between Jesus Christ and God particularly interpretations that emphasize a more monotheistic interpretation of Atenism than a henotheistic one. Donald B. Redford has noted that some have viewed Akhenaten as a harbinger of Jesus. After all Akhenaten did call himself the son of the sole god Thine only son that came forth from thy body.245 James Henry Breasted likened him to Jesus246 Arthur Weigall saw him as a failed precursor of Christ and Thomas Mann saw him as right on the way and yet not the right one for the way.247 Although scholars like Brian Fagan 2015 and Robert Alter 2018 have reopened the debate in 1997 Redford concluded Before much of the archaeological evidence from Thebes and from Tell elAmarna became available wishful thinking sometimes turned Akhenaten into a humane teacher of the true God a mentor of Moses a christlike figure a philosopher before his time. But these imaginary creatures are now fading away as the historical reality gradually emerges. There is little or no evidence to support the notion that Akhenaten was a progenitor of the fullblown monotheism that we find in the Bible. The monotheism of the Hebrew Bible and the New Testament had its own separate developmentone that began more than half a millennium after the pharaohs death.248 Possible illness Hieratic inscription on a pottery fragment. It records year 17 of Akhenatens reign and references wine of the house of Aten. From Amarna Egypt. The Petrie Museum of Egyptian Archaeology London Limestone trial piece of a king probably Akhenaten and a smaller head of uncertain gender. From Amarna Egypt  
18 th Dynasty. The Petrie Museum of Egyptian Archaeology London The unconventional portrayals of Akhenatendifferent from the traditional athletic norm in the portrayal of pharaohshave led Egyptologists in the 
19 th and 
20 th centuries to suppose that Akhenaten had some kind of genetic abnormality.223 Various illnesses have been put forward with Frhlichs syndrome or Marfan syndrome being mentioned most commonly.249 Cyril Aldred250 following up earlier arguments of Grafton Elliot Smith251 and James Strachey252 suggested that Akhenaten may have had Frhlichs syndrome on the basis of his long jaw and his feminine appearance. However this is unlikely because this disorder results in sterility and Akhenaten is known to have fathered numerous children. His children are repeatedly portrayed through years of archaeological and iconographic evidence.253 Burridge254 suggested that Akhenaten may have had Marfan syndrome which unlike Frhlichs does not result in mental impairment or sterility. People with Marfan syndrome tend towards tallness with a long thin face elongated skull overgrown ribs a funnel or pigeon chest a high curved or slightly cleft palate and larger pelvis with enlarged thighs and spindly calves symptoms that appear in some depictions of Akhenaten.255 Marfan syndrome is a dominant characteristic which means those affected have a 50 chance of passing it on to their children.256 However DNA tests on Tutankhamun in 2010 proved negative for Marfan syndrome.257 By the early 
21 st century most Egyptologists argued that Akhenatens portrayals are not the results of a genetic or medical condition but rather should be interpreted as stylized portrayals influenced by Atenism.209226 Akhenaten was made to look androgynous in artwork as a symbol of the androgyny of the Aten.226 Cultural depictions Akhenatens life accomplishments and legacy have been preserved and depicted in many ways and he has figured in works of both high and popular culture since his rediscovery in the 
19 th century AD. Akhenatenalongside Cleopatra and Alexander the Greatis among the most often popularized and fictionalized ancient historical figures.258 On page Amarna novels most often take one of two forms. They are either a Bildungsroman focusing on Akhenatens psychological and moral growth as it relates to establishing Atenism and Akhetaten as well as his struggles against the Theban Amun cult. Alternatively his literary depictions focus on the aftermath of his reign and religion.259 A dividing line also exists between depictions of Akhenaten from before the 19
20 s and since when more and more archeological discoveries started to provide artists with material evidence about his life and times. Thus before the 19
20 s Akhenaten had appeared as a ghost a spectral figure in art while since he has become realistic material and tangible.260 Examples of the former include the romance novels In the Tombs of the Kings 1910 by Lilian Bagnallthe first appearance by Akhenaten and his wife Nefertiti in fictionand A Wife Out of Egypt 1913 and There Was a King in Egypt 1918 by Norma Lorimer. Examples of the latter include Akhnaton King of Egypt 1924 by Dmitry Merezhkovsky Joseph and His Brothers 19331943 by Thomas Mann Akhnaton 1973 by Agatha Christie and Akhenaten Dweller in Truth 1985 by Naguib Mahfouz. Akhenaten also appears in The Egyptian 1945 by Mika Waltari which was adapted into the movie The Egyptian 1953. In this movie Akhenaten portrayed by Michael Wilding appears to represent Jesus Christ and his followers protoChristians.261 A sexualized image of Akhenaten building on early Western interest in the pharaohs androgynous depictions perceived potential homosexuality and identification with Oedipal storytelling also influenced modern works of art.262 The two most notable portrayals are Akenaten 1975 an unfilmed screenplay by Derek Jarman and Akhnaten 1984 an opera by Philip Glass.263264 Both were influenced by the unproven and scientifically unsupported theories of Immanuel Velikovsky who equated Oedipus with Akhenaten265 although Glass specifically denies his personal belief in Velikovskys Oedipus theory or caring about its historical validity instead being drawn to its potential theatricality.266 In the 
21 st century Akhenaten appeared as an antagonist in comic books and video games. For example he is the major antagonist in limited comicbook series Marvel The End 2003. In this series Akhenaten is abducted by an alien order in the 
14 th century BC and reappears on modern Earth seeking to restore his kingdom. He is opposed by essentially all of the other superheroes and supervillains in the Marvel comic book universe and is eventually defeated by Thanos.267 Additionally Akhenaten appears as the enemy in the Assassins Creed Origins The Curse of the Pharaohs downloadable content 2017 and must be defeated to remove his curse on Thebes.267 His afterlife takes the form of Aten a location that draws heavily on the architecture of the city of Amarna.268 American death metal band Nile depicted Akhenatens judgement punishment and erasure from history at the hands of the pantheon that he replaced with Aten in the song Cast Down the Heretic from their 2005 album Annihilation of the Wicked. He was also featured on the cover artwork of their 2009 album Those Whom the Gods Detest. Ancestry 16. Thutmose III 8. Amenhotep II 17. MerytreHatshepsut 4. Thutmose IV 9. Tiaa 2. Amenhotep III 5. Mutemwiya 1. Akhenaten 6. Yuya 3. Tiye 7. Tjuyu See also Pharaoh of the Exodus Osarseph Notes and references Notes  Cohen  Westbrook 2002 p. 6.  Rogers 1912 p. 252.  a b c d Britannica.com 2012.  a b c d e von Beckerath 1997 p. 190.  a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r Leprohon 2013 pp. 104105.  a b c Strouhal 2010 pp. 97112.  a b c Duhig 2010 p. 114.  Dictionary.com 2008.  Kitchen 2003 p. 486.  a b Tyldesley 2005.  Montserrat 2003 pp. 105 111.  Loprieno Antonio 1995 Ancient Egyptian A Linguistic Introduction Cambridge Cambridge University Press  Loprieno Antonio 2001 From Ancient Egyptian to Coptic in Haspelmath Martin et al. eds. Language Typology and Language Universals  a b Ridley 2019 pp. 1315.  Hart 2000 p. 44.  Manniche 2010 p. ix.  Zaki 2008 p. 19.  Gardiner 1905 p. 11.  Trigger et al. 2001 pp. 186187.  Hornung 1992 pp. 4344.  a b Hawass et al. 2010.  Marchant 2011 pp. 40406.  Lorenzen  Willerslev 2010.  Bickerstaffe 2010.  Spence 2011.  Sooke 2014.  Hessler 2017.  Silverman Wegner  Wegner 2006 pp. 185188.  Ridley 2019 pp. 3739.  Dodson 2018 p. 6.  Laboury 2010 pp. 62 224.  Ridley 2019 pp. 220.  Tyldesley 2006 p. 124.  Murnane 1995 pp. 9 9093 210211.  Grajetzki 2005.  Dodson 2012 p. 1.  Ridley 2019 p. 78.  Laboury 2010 pp. 314322.  Dodson 2009 pp. 4142.  University College London 2001.  Ridley 2019 p. 262.  Dodson 2018 pp. 174175.  a b Dodson 2018 pp. 3839.  Dodson 2009 pp. 8487.  Ridley 2019 pp. 263265.  a b Harris  Wente 1980 pp. 137140.  Allen 2009 pp. 1518.  Ridley 2019 p. 257.  Robins 1993 pp. 2127.  Dodson 2018 pp. 1921.  Dodson  Hilton 2004 p. 154.  Redford 2013 p. 13.  Ridley 2019 pp. 4041.  Redford 1984 pp. 5758.  Hoffmeier 2015 p. 65.  Laboury 2010 p. 81.  Murnane 1995 p. 78.  Hoffmeier 2015 p. 64.  a b Aldred 1991 p. 259.  Reeves 2019 p. 77.  Berman 2004 p. 23.  Kitchen 2000 p. 44.  Martn Valentn  Bedman 2014.  Brand 2020 pp. 6364.  Ridley 2019 p. 45.  a b Ridley 2019 p. 46.  Ridley 2019 p. 48.  Aldred 1991 pp. 259268.  Redford 2013 pp. 1314.  Dodson 2014 pp. 156160.  a b Nims 1973 pp. 186187.  Redford 2013 p. 19.  Hoffmeier 2015 pp. 98 101 105106.  DesrochesNoblecourt 1963 pp. 144145.  Gohary 1992 pp. 2939 167169.  Murnane 1995 pp. 5051.  Ridley 2019 pp. 8385.  Hoffmeier 2015 p. 166.  Murnane  Van Siclen III 2011 p. 150.  a b Ridley 2019 pp. 8587.  Fecht 1960 p. 89.  Hornung 2001 p. 50.  Elmar 1948.  Ridley 2019 p. 85.  Dodson 2014 pp. 180185.  Dodson 2014 pp. 186188.  a b Ridley 2019 pp. 8590.  Redford 2013 pp. 910 2426.  Aldred 1991 pp. 269270.  Breasted 2001 pp. 390400.  Arnold 2003 p. 238.  Shaw 2003 p. 274.  Aldred 1991 pp. 269273.  Shaw 2003 pp. 293297.  Moran 1992 pp. xiii xv.  Moran 1992 p. xvi.  Aldred 1991 chpt. 11.  Moran 1992 pp. 8789.  Drioton  Vandier 1952 pp. 411414.  Ridley 2019 pp. 297 314.  Moran 1992 p. 203.  Ross 1999 pp. 3035.  Bryce 1998 p. 186.  Cohen  Westbrook 2002 pp. 102 248.  Hall 1921 pp. 4243.  Breasted 1909 p. 355.  Davies 19031908 part II. p. 42.  Baikie 1926 p. 269.  Moran 1992 pp. 368369.  Ridley 2019 pp. 316317.  Murnane 1995 pp. 5556.  Darnell  Manassa 2007 pp. 118119.  Ridley 2019 pp. 323324.  Schulman 1982.  Murnane 1995 p. 99.  Aldred 1968 p. 241.  Gabolde 1998 pp. 195205.  Darnell  Manassa 2007 pp. 172178.  Ridley 2019 pp. 235236 244247.  Ridley 2019 p. 346.  a b Van der Perre 2012 pp. 195197.  Van der Perre 2014 pp. 67108.  Ridley 2019 pp. 346364.  a b Dodson 2009 pp. 3941.  Darnell  Manassa 2007 p. 127.  Ridley 2019 p. 141.  Redford 1984 pp. 185192.  Braverman Redford  Mackowiak 2009 p. 557.  Dodson 2009 p. 49.  Laroche 1971 p. 378.  Gabolde 2011.  Ridley 2019 pp. 354 376.  Dodson 2014 p. 144.  Tyldesley 1998 pp. 160175.  Ridley 2019 pp. 337 345.  Ridley 2019 p. 252.  Allen 1988 pp. 117126.  Kemp 2015 p. 11.  Ridley 2019 pp. 365371.  Dodson 2014 p. 244.  Aldred 1968 pp. 140162.  Ridley 2019 pp. 411412.  Dodson 2009 pp. 144145.  Allen 2009 pp. 14.  Ridley 2019 p. 251.  Tyldesley 2006 pp. 136137.  Hornung Krauss  Warburton 2006 pp. 207 493.  Ridley 2019.  Dodson 2018 pp. 7576.  Hawass et al. 2010 p. 644.  Marchant 2011 pp. 404406.  Dodson 2018 pp. 1617.  a b Ridley 2019 pp. 409411.  Dodson 2018 pp. 17 41.  Dodson 2014 pp. 245249.  Hoffmeier 2015 pp. 241243.  Ridley 2019 p. 415.  Mark 2014.  van Dijk 2003 p. 303.  a b Assmann 2005 p. 44.  Wilkinson 2003 p. 55.  Reeves 2019 pp. 139 181.  Breasted 1972 pp. 344370.  Ockinga 2001 pp. 4446.  Wilkinson 2003 p. 94.  van Dijk 2003 p. 307.  van Dijk 2003 pp. 303307.  Kitchen 1986 p. 531.  Baines 2007 p. 156.  Goldwasser 1992 pp. 448450.  Gardiner 2015.  OConnor  Silverman 1995 pp. 7779.  Druze. druze.de. Retrieved January 18 2022.  Dana L.P. ed. 2010. Entrepreneurship and Religion. Edward Elgar Pub. ISBN 9781849806329. OCLC 741355693.  Hornung 2001 p. 19.  Sethe 19061909 pp. 19 332 1569.  a b Redford 2013 p. 11.  Hornung 2001 pp. 33 35.  a b Hornung 2001 p. 48.  Redford 1976 pp. 5356.  Hornung 2001 pp. 7273.  Ridley 2019 p. 43.  a b David 1998 p. 125.  Aldred 1991 pp. 261262.  Hoffmeier 2015 pp. 160161.  Redford 2013 p. 14.  Perry 2019 0359.  Hornung 2001 pp. 3436 54.  Hornung 2001 pp. 39 42 54.  Hornung 2001 pp. 5557.  Brta  Dulkov 2015 pp. 41 43.  Ridley 2019 p. 188.  Hart 2000 pp. 4246.  Hornung 2001 pp. 55 84.  Najovits 2004 p. 125.  Ridley 2019 pp. 211213.  Ridley 2019 pp. 28 173174.  Dodson 2009 p. 38.  Najovits 2004 pp. 123124.  Najovits 2004 p. 128.  Hornung 2001 p. 52.  Ridley 2019 pp. 129 133.  Ridley 2019 p. 128.  Najovits 2004 p. 131.  Ridley 2019 pp. 128129.  Hornung 1992 p. 47.  Allen 2005 pp. 217221.  Ridley 2019 pp. 187194.  a b c Reeves 2019 pp. 154155.  Hornung 2001 p. 56.  Dodson 2018 pp. 47 50.  Redford 1984 p. 207.  Silverman Wegner  Wegner 2006 pp. 165166.  Hoffmeier 2015 pp. 197 239242.  van Dijk 2003 p. 284.  Hoffmeier 2015 pp. 239242.  Hornung 2001 pp. 4344.  Najovits 2004 p. 144.  a b Baptista Santamarina  Conant 2017.  Arnold 1996 p. viii.  Hornung 2001 pp. 4247.  Sooke 2016.  a b Takcs  Cline 2015 pp. 56.  Braverman Redford  Mackowiak 2009.  Braverman  Mackowiak 2010.  a b c d e Montserrat 2003.  Najovits 2004 p. 145.  Aldred 1985 p. 174.  Arnold 1996 p. 114.  Hornung 2001 p. 44.  Najovits 2004 pp. 146147.  Arnold 1996 p. 85.  Arnold 1996 pp. 8586.  Montserrat 2003 p. 36.  a b c d Freud 1939.  Stent 2002 pp. 3438.  Assmann 1997.  Shupak 1995.  Albright 1973.  Chaney 20
06 a pp. 6269.  Chaney 20
06 b.  Assmann 1997 pp. 2324.  Hoffmeier 2015 pp. 246256 ...it seems best to conclude for the present that the parallels between Amarna hymns to Aten and Psalm 104 should be attributed to the common theology and the general pattern... Hoffmeier 2005 p. 239 ...There has been some debate whether the similarities direct or indirect borrowing... it is unlikely that the Israelite who composed Psalm 104 borrowed directly from the sublime Egyptian Hymn to the Aten as Stager has recently claimed. Alter 2018 p. 54 ...I think there may be some likelihood however unprovable that our psalmist was familiar with at least an intermediate version of Akhenatons hymn and adopted some elements from it. Brown 2014 p. 6173 the question of the relationship between Egyptian hymns and the Psalms remains open  Assmann 2020 pp. 4043 Verses 2030 cannot be understood as anything other than a loose and abridged translation of the Great Hymn... Day 2014 pp. 2223 ...a significant part of the rest Of Psalm 104 esp. vv. 2030 is dependent on... Akhenatens Hymn to the Sun god Aten... these parallels almost all come in the same order... Day 2013 pp. 223224 ...this dependence is confined to vv. 2030. Here the evidence is particularly impressive since we have six parallels with Akhenatens hymn... occurring in the identical order with one exception. Landes 2011 pp. 155 178 the hymn to Aten quoted as epigraph to this chapterreplicates the intense religiosity and even the language of the Hebrew Psalm 104. Indeed most Egyptologists argue that this hymn inspired the psalm... ...For some the relationship to Hebraic monotheism seems extremely close including the nearly verbatim passages in Psalm 104 and the Hymn to Aten found in one of the tombs at Akhetaten... Shaw 2004 p. 19 An intriguing direct literary and perhaps religious link between Egypt and the Bible is Psalm 104 which has strong similarities with a hymn to the Aten  Redford 1987.  Levenson 1994 p. 60.  Hornung 2001 p. 14.  Redford Shanks  Meinhardt 1997.  Ridley 2019 p. 87.  Aldred 1991.  Smith 1923 pp. 8388.  Strachey 1939.  Hawass 2010.  Burridge 1995.  Lorenz 2010.  National Center for Advancing Translational Sciences 2017.  Schemm 2010.  Montserrat 2003 p. 139.  Montserrat 2003 p. 144.  Montserrat 2003 p. 154.  Montserrat 2003 pp. 163 200212.  Montserrat 2003 pp. 168 170.  Montserrat 2003 pp. 175176.  Davidson 2019.  Montserrat 2003 p. 176.  Glass Philip 1987 Music by Philip Glass New York Harper  Row. p.137138. ISBN 0060158239  a b Marvel 2021.  Hotton 2018. Bibliography Akhenaten. Dictionary.com. Archived from the original on October 14 2008. Retrieved October 2 2008. Dorman Peter F. Akhenaton King of Egypt. Britannica.com. Retrieved August 25 2012. Albright William F. 1973. From the Patriarchs to Moses II. Moses out of Egypt. The Biblical Archaeologist. 36 2 4876. doi
10.2 3073211050. JSTOR 3211050. S
2 CID 135099403. Aldred Cyril 1968. Akhenaten Pharaoh of Egypt A New Study. New Aspects of Antiquity 
1 st ed.. London Thames and Hudson. ISBN 9780500390047. Aldred Cyril 1985 1980. Egyptian art in the Days of the Pharaohs 310032 BC. World of Art. London New York Thames  Hudson. ISBN 0500201803. LCCN 8451309. Aldred Cyril 1991 1988. Akhenaten King of Egypt. London Thames and Hudson. ISBN 0500276218. Allen James Peter 1988. Two Altered Inscriptions of the Late Amarna Period. Journal of the American Research Center in Egypt. 25. San Antonio Texas American Research Center in Egypt 117126. doi
10.2 30740000874. ISSN 00659991. JSTOR 40000874. Allen James P. 2005. Akhenaton. In Jones L ed.. Encyclopedia of Religion. Macmillan Reference. Allen James Peter 2009. The Amarna Succession. In Brand Peter Cooper Louise eds.. Causing His Name to Live Studies in Egyptian Epigraphy and History in Memory of William J. Murnane PDF. Culture and History of the Ancient Near East. Vol. 37. Leiden E. J. Brill Academic Publishers. pp. 920. doi
10.1 1
63 ej.9789004176447.i2
40.9 . ISBN 9789047429883. Archived PDF from the original on May 21 2020. Retrieved May 21 2020. Alter Robert 2018. Couey J. Blake James Elaine T. eds.. Biblical Poetry and the Art of Close Reading. Cambridge University Press. ISBN 9781107156203. Amenhotep IV  Akhenaten. Marvel. 2021. Retrieved April 4 2021. Arnold Dieter 2003 1994. Strudwick Nigel Strudwick Helen eds.. The Encyclopaedia of Ancient Egyptian Architecture English language ed.. London I.B. Tauris. ISBN 1860644651. Arnold Dorothea 1996. The Royal Women of Amarna Images of Beauty from Ancient Egypt Exhibition catalogue. New York The Metropolitan Museum of Art. ISBN 0870998161. Assmann Jan 1997. Moses the Egyptian The Memory of Egypt in Western Monotheism. Cambridge Massachusetts Harvard University Press. ISBN 0674587391. Assmann Jan 2005. Axial Breakthroughs and Semantic Relocations in Ancient Egypt and Israel PDF. In Giesen Bernhard uber Daniel eds.. Religion And Politics Cultural Perspectives Conference publication. International Studies in Religion and Society. Vol. 3. Leiden Boston Brill Academic Publishers. pp. 3953. ISBN 9789004144637. Retrieved June 21 2020. Assmann Jan 2020. The Invention of Religion Faith and Covenant in the Book of Exodus. Princeton University Press. ISBN 9780691203195. Baines John Robert 2007. Visual and Written Culture in Ancient Egypt. Oxford New York Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780198152507. OCLC 804615763. Baikie James 1926. The Amarna Age. London A. and C. Black. Baptista Fernando G. Santamarina Oscar Conant Eve April 20 2017. The Age of Akhenaten. National Geographic. Archived from the original on November 19 2018. Retrieved June 11 2020. Brta Miroslav Dulkov Veronika 2015. Divine and Terrestrial The Rhetoric of Power in Ancient Egypt The Case of Nyuserra. In Coppens Filip Jank Ji Vymazalov Hana eds.. Royal versus Divine Authority Acquisition Legitimization and Renewal of Power 
7 th Symposium on Egyptian Royal Ideology Prague June 2628 2013 Conference publication. Knigtum Staat und Gesellschaft frher Hochkulturen. Vol. 4 4. Wiesbaden Harrassowitz Verlag. pp. 3147. ISBN 9783447104272. OCLC 940935344. von Beckerath Jrgen 1997. Chronologie des Pharaonischen gypten Die Zeitbestimmung der gyptischen Geschichte von der Vorzeit bis 332 v. Chr. Mnchner gyptologische Studien in German. Vol. 46. Mainz Philipp von Zabern. ISBN 3805323107. Berman Lawrence 2004 1998. Overview of Amenhotep III and His Reign. In OConnor David B. Cline Eric H. eds.. Amenhotep III Perspectives on His Reign. Ann Arbor The University of Michigan Press. ISBN 0472088335. Bickerstaffe Dylan 2010. The King Is Dead. How Long Lived the King. Kmt. 21 2. Weaverville North Carolina Kmt Communications. ISSN 10530827. Brand Peter J. 2020. The Historical Record. In Davies Vanessa Laboury Dimitri eds.. The Oxford Handbook of Egyptian Epigraphy and Palaeography. Oxford Handbooks. Oxford New York Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780190604653. Braverman Irwin M. Mackowiak Philip A. June 23 2010. King Tutankhamuns Family and Demise. Letters. Journal of the American Medical Association. 303 24. Chicago Illinois American Medical Association 24712475. doi
10.1 0
01 jama.20
10.8 21. ISSN 15383598. PMID 20571008. Retrieved May 24 2020. Braverman Irwin M. Redford Donald B. Mackowiak Philip A. April 21 2009. Akhenaten and the Strange Physiques of Egypts 
18 th Dynasty. Annals of Internal Medicine. 150 8. American College of Physicians 556560. doi
10.7 32600034819150820090421000010. ISSN 15393704. OCLC 43032966. PMID 19380856. S
2 CID 24766974. Breasted James Henry ed. 2001 1906. Ancient Records of Egypt. Vol. 2 Paperback ed.. Urbana Chicago University of Illinois Press. ISBN 0252069749. Breasted James Henry 1909. A History Of Egypt From the Earliest Times to the Persian Conquest 
2 nd ed.. New York Charles Scribners Sons. OCLC 848576611. Breasted James Henry 1972. Development of religion and thought in ancient Egypt. Philadelphia Pennsylvania University of Pennsylvania Press. ISBN 9780812210453. Brown William P. 2014. The Oxford Handbook of the Psalms. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780199790500. Bryce Trevor Robert 1998. The Kingdom of the Hittites First ed.. Oxford New York Clarendon Press Oxford University Press. ISBN 0198140959. LCCN 97014411. Burridge A. September 1995. Did Akhenaten Suffer From Marfans Syndrome. Akhenaten Temple Project Newsletter 3. Chaney Edward 20
06 a. Freudian Egypt. The London Magazine. 2016 AprilMay. London Burhan AlChalabi 6269. ISSN 00246085. Chaney Edward 20
06 b. Egypt in England and America The Cultural Memorials of Religion Royalty and Revolution. In Ascari Maurizio Corrado Adriana eds.. Sites of Exchange European Crossroads and Faultlines. Internationale Forschungen Zur Allgemeinen Und Vergleichenden Literaturwissenschaft. Vol. 103. Amsterdam Rodopi. pp. 3969. ISBN 9789042020153. Clayton Peter 2006. Chronicle of the Pharaohs Thames and Hudson Cohen Raymond Westbrook Raymond eds. 2002 2000. Amarna Diplomacy The Beginnings of International Relations Paperback ed.. Baltimore London The Johns Hopkins University Press. ISBN 0801871034. Darnell John Coleman Manassa Colleen 2007. Tutankhamuns Armies Battle and Conquest during Ancient Egypts Late 
18 th Dynasty. Hoboken New Jersey John Wiley  Sons Inc. ISBN 9780471743583. OCLC 70265584. David Rosalie 1998. Handbook to Life in Ancient Egypt. Facts on File Inc. Davidson Justin November 11 2019. Gleaming and SelfAware Philip Glasss Akhnaten Is Borne to the Met. Vulture. Vox Media. Archived from the original on October 21 2020. Retrieved April 4 2021. Davies Norman de Garis 19031908. The Rock Tombs of El Amarna. Memoir Archaeological Survey of Egypt. Vol. 1314. London Egypt Exploration Fund. OCLC 11263615. Day John 2013. Psalm 104 and Akhenatens Hymn to the Sun. In Gillingham Susan ed.. Jewish and Christian Approaches to the Psalms Conflict and Convergence. Oxford University Press. pp. 211228. ISBN 9780199699544. Day John 2014. From Creation to Babel Studies in Genesis 111. Bloomsbury Publishing. ISBN 9780567370303. DesrochesNoblecourt Christiane 1963. Tutankhamen Life and Death of a Pharaoh. Illustrated by F. L. Kenett 
1 st ed.. New York New York Graphic Society. ISBN 9780821201510. van Dijk Jacobus 2003 2000. The Amarna Period and the Later New Kingdom c.13521069 BC PDF. In Shaw Ian ed.. The Oxford History of Ancient Egypt New ed.. Oxford New York Oxford University Press. pp. 265307. ISBN 9780192804587. Archived PDF from the original on June 19 2018. Retrieved June 21 2020. Dodson Aidan 2012. Akhenaten Amenhotep IV. In Bagnall Roger S. Brodersen Kai Champion Craige B. Erskine Andrew Huebner Sabine R. eds.. The Encyclopedia of Ancient History. Vol. 1. Malden Massachusetts Blackwell Publishing Ltd. ISBN 9781405179355. OCLC 230191195. Dodson Aidan 2014. Amarna Sunrise Egypt from the Golden Age to Age of Heresy 
1 st ed.. Cairo New York The American University in Cairo Press. ISBN 9789774166334. Dodson Aidan 2009. Amarna Sunset Nefertiti Tutankhamun Ay Horemheb and the Egyptian CounterReformation 
1 st ed.. Cairo New York The American University in Cairo Press. ISBN 9789774163043. Dodson Aidan 2018 2009. Amarna Sunset Nefertiti Tutankhamun Ay Horemheb and the Egyptian CounterReformation Revised ed.. Cairo New York The American University in Cairo Press. ISBN 9789774168598. OCLC 1004248105. Dodson Aidan Hilton Dyan 2004. The Complete Royal Families of Ancient Egypt. Thames  Hudson. Drioton tienne Vandier Jacques 1952 1938. Lgypte. Les Peuples de lOrient Mditerranen in French. Vol. II 
3 rd ed.. Paris Presses Universitaires de France. Duhig Corinne 2010. The remains of Pharaoh Akhenaten are not yet identified Comments on Biological age of the skeletonised mummy from Tomb KV55 at Thebes Egypt by Eugen Strouhal. Anthropologie. 48 2. Moravian Museum 113115. JSTOR 26292899. It is essential that whether the KV55 skeleton is that of Smenkhkare or some previouslyunknown prince... the assumption that the KV55 bones are those of Akhenaten be rejected before it becomes received wisdom. Elmar Edel 1948. Neue Keilschriftliche Umschreibungen gyptischer Namen aus den Boazkytexten. Journal of Near Eastern Studies in German. 7 1. The University of Chicago Press 1124. doi
10.1 086370848. ISSN 00222968. JSTOR 542570. Fecht Gerhard 1960. Amarna Probleme 12. Zeitschrift fr gyptische Sprache und Altertumskunde in German. 85. De Gruyter 83118. doi
10.1 5
24 zaes.1960.

85.1.9 9. ISSN 00442
16 X. S
2 CID 192846780. Freud Sigmund 1939. Moses and Monotheism. New York A.A. Knopf. OCLC 624780. Gabolde Marc 1998. DAkhenaton  Toutnkhamon. Collection de lInstitut dArchologie et dHistoire de lAntiquit in French. Vol. 3. Lyon Universit LumireLyon 2. ISBN 9782911971020. ISSN 12752
69 X. Gabolde Marc February 17 2011. The End of the Amarna Period. BBC.co.uk. BBC. Retrieved June 12 2020. Gardiner Alan H. 1905. The Inscriptions of Mes A Contribution to the Study of Egyptian Judicial Procedure. Untersuchungen zur Geschichte und Altertumskunde gyptens. Vol. IV Book 3. J. C. Hinrichs publishers. Retrieved July 24 2020. Gardiner Shayna 2015. Taking Possession of the Constant Rate Hypothesis Variation and Change in Ancient Egyptian Possessive Constructions. University of Pennsylvania Working Papers in Linguistics. 21 2 6978. Gohary Jocelyn Olive 1992. Akhenatens Sedfestival at Karnak. Studies in Egyptology 
1 st ed.. London New York Kegan Paul International. ISBN 9780710303806. ISSN 17546
01 X. OCLC 22309806. Goldwasser Orly 1992. Literary Late Egyptian as a Polysystem. Poetics Today. 13 3. Duke University Press 447462. doi
10.2 3071772871. ISSN 03335372. JSTOR 1772871. Grajetzki Wolfram 2005. Ancient Egyptian Queens A Hieroglyphic Dictionary. London Golden House Publications. ISBN 9780954721893. OCLC 61189103. Hall Henry 1921. Egypt and the External World in the Time of Akhenaten. The Journal of Egyptian Archaeology. 7 1 3953. doi
10.1 177030751332100700105. S
2 CID 192247058. Harris James E. Wente Edward F. eds. 1980. An Xray Atlas of the Royal Mummies 
1 st ed.. Chicago University of Chicago Press. ISBN 9780226317458. Hart George 2000 1986. A Dictionary of Egyptian Gods and Goddesses. London New York Routledge. ISBN 0415059097. Hawass Zahi September 2010. King Tuts Family Secrets. National Geographic. Photographs by Kenneth Garrett. Washington D.C. National Geographic Society. Archived from the original on May 9 2020. Retrieved May 13 2020. Hawass Zahi Gad Yehia Z. Somaia Ismail Khairat Rabab Fathalla Dina Hasan Naglaa Ahmed Amal Elleithy Hisham Ball Markus Gaballah Fawzi Wasef Sally Fateen Mohamed Amer Hany Gostner Paul Selim Ashraf Zink Albert Pusch Carsten M. February 17 2010. Ancestry and Pathology in King Tutankhamuns Family. Journal of the American Medical Association. 303 7. Chicago Illinois American Medical Association 638647. doi
10.1 0
01 jama.20
10.1 21. ISSN 15383598. PMID 20159872. Retrieved May 24 2020. Hessler Peter 2017. Meet King Tuts Father Egypts First Revolutionary. National Geographic. National Geographic Society. Retrieved May 10 2020. Hoffmeier James K. 2005. Ancient Israel in Sinai The Evidence for the Authenticity of the Wilderness Tradition. Oxford University Press USA. ISBN 9780195155464. Hoffmeier James Karl 2015. Akhenaten and the Origins of Monotheism 
1 st ed.. Oxford New York Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780199792085. Hornung Erik 1992. The Rediscovery of Akhenaten and His Place in Religion. Journal of the American Research Center in Egypt. 29. San Antonio Texas American Research Center in Egypt 4349. doi
10.2 30740000483. ISSN 00659991. JSTOR 40000483. Hornung Erik 2001 1995. Akhenaten and the Religion of Light. Translated by Lorton David. Ithaca New York London Cornell University Press. ISBN 9780801487255. OCLC 48417401. Hornung Erik Krauss Rolf Warburton David eds. 2006. Ancient Egyptian Chronology. Handbook of Oriental Studies. Vol. 83. Brill. ISBN 9789004113855. Hotton Emily November 3 2018. Game Review Assassins Creed  The Curse of the Pharaohs. Nile Scribe. Retrieved April 4 2021. Kemp Barry John 2015. The Amarna Royal Tombs at Amarna PDF. Akhetaten Sun. Vol. 21 no. 2. Denver Colorado Amarna Research Foundation. pp. 213. Archived from the original PDF on June 8 2020. Retrieved June 20 2020. Kitchen Kenneth Anderson 2003. On the Reliability of the Old Testament. Grand Rapids Michigan William. B. Eerdmans Publishing. ISBN 9780802803962. Kitchen Kenneth Anderson 2000. Regnal and Genealogical Data of Ancient Egypt Absolute Chronology I The Historical Chronology of Ancient Egypt A Current Assessment. In Bietak Manfred ed.. The Synchronisation of Civlisations in the Eastern Mediterranean in the Second Millennium B.C. Proceedings of an international symposium at Schloss Haindorf 
15 th
17 th of November 1996 and at the Austrian Academy Vienna 
11 th
12 th of May 1998 Conference proceedings. Contributions to the Chronology of the Eastern Mediterranean. Vol. 4. Vienna Austria Austrian Academy of Sciences Press. ISBN 9783700129363. Kitchen Kenneth Anderson 1986 1972. The Third Intermediate Period in Egypt 1100650 BC 
2 nd ed.. Warminster England Aris  Phillips. ISBN 9780856682988. Laboury Dimitri 2010. Akhnaton. Les grands pharaons in French. Paris PygmalionFlammarion. ISBN 9782756400433. Landes Richard 2011. Heaven on Earth The Varieties of the Millennial Experience. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780199831814. Laroche Emmanuel 1971. Catalogue des Textes Hittites in French. Paris Klincksieck. OCLC 607304. Leprohon Ronald J. 2013. The Great Name Ancient Egyptian Royal Titulary. SBL Press. ISBN 9781589837362. Levenson Jon Douglas 1994. Creation and the persistence of evil. Princeton University Press. ISBN 0691029504. Lorenz Megaera. Lorenz Maegara The Mystery of Akhenaton Genetics or Aesthetics. Heptune.com. Archived from the original on February 8 2010. Retrieved March 21 2010. Lorenzen Eline D Willerslev E 2010. King Tutankhamuns Family and Demise. JAMA. 303 24 2471 author reply 2473475. doi
10.1 0
01 jama.20
10.8 18. PMID 20571007. Manniche Lise 2010. Akhenaten Colossi of Karnak. Cairo American University in Cairo Press. OCLC 938908123. Marchant Jo 2011. Ancient DNA Curse of the Pharaohs DNA. Nature. 472 7344 404406. Bibcode20
11 Natur.472..4
04 M. doi
10.1 0384724
04 a. PMID 21525906. Marfan syndrome. Gaithersburg Maryland National Center for Advancing Translational Sciences. January 26 2017. Archived from the original on November 5 2018. Retrieved May 21 2020. Mark Joshua J. April 22 2014. Horemheb. World History Encyclopedia. Retrieved June 10 2020. Martn Valentn Francesco J. Bedman Teresa 2014. Proof of a Long Coregency between Amenhotep III  Amenhotep IV Found in the Chapel of Vizier AmenhotepHuy Asasif Tomb 28 West Luxor. Kmt. 25 2. Weaverville North Carolina Kmt Communications 1727. ISSN 10530827. Montserrat Dominic 2003 2000. Akhenaten History Fantasy and Ancient Egypt 
1 st paperback ed.. London New York Routledge. ISBN 0415301866. Moran William Lambert ed. 1992 1987. The Amarna Letters Englishlanguage ed.. Baltimore London The Johns Hopkins University Press. ISBN 0801842514. LCCN 91020570. Murnane William J. 1995. Texts from the Amarna Period in Egypt. Society of Biblical Literature Writings from the Ancient World. Vol. 5. Atlanta Society of Biblical Literature. ISBN 9781555409661. Murnane William J. Van Siclen III Charles C. 2011 1993. The Boundary Stelae Of Akhentaten. London New York Routledge. ISBN 9780710304643. Najovits Simson 2004. Egypt the Trunk of the Tree A Modern Survey of and Ancient Land Vol. II. New York Algora Publishing. ISBN 9780875862569. Nims Charles F. 1973. The Transition from the Traditional to the New Style of Wall Relief under Amenhotep IV. Journal of Near Eastern Studies. 32 12. Chicago Illinois University of Chicago Press 181187. doi
10.1 086372234. ISSN 00222968. JSTOR 543483. Van der Perre Athena 2012. Nofretetes vorerst letzte dokumentierte Erwhnung. In KamppSeyfried Friederike ed.. Im Licht von Amarna  100 Jahre Fund der Nofretete Exhibition catalogue in German. Petersberg Hesse Imhof Verlag. ISBN 9783865688422. Van der Perre Athena 2014. The Year 16 graffito of Akhenaten in Dayr Ab innis A Contribution to the Study of the Later Years of Nefertiti. Journal of Egyptian History. 7 1. Brill 67108. doi
10.1 1631874166512340014. ISSN 18741657. Perry Dominic May 15 2019. The Aten Appears Episode 110. The History of Egypt Podcast Podcast. Event occurs at 0359. Retrieved May 23 2020. OConnor David Silverman David P. eds. 1995. Ancient Egyptian Kingship. Probleme der gyptologie. Vol. 9. Leiden New York Kln Brill. ISBN 9004100415. Ockinga Boyo 2001. Piety. In Redford Donald ed.. The Oxford Encyclopedia of Ancient Egypt. Vol. 3. Oxford University Press. pp. 4447. ISBN 0195102347. Redford Donald B. 1976. The Sundisc in Akhenatens Program Its Worship and Antecedents I. Journal of the American Research Center in Egypt. 13. San Antonio Texas American Research Center in Egypt 5356. doi
10.2 30740001118. ISSN 00659991. JSTOR 40001118. Redford Donald B. 1984. Akhenaten The Heretic King. Princeton New Jersey Princeton University Press. ISBN 9780691035673. OCLC 10099207. Redford Donald B. 1987. The Monotheism of the Heretic Pharaoh Precursor of Mosaic monotheism or Egyptian anomaly. Biblical Archaeology Review. 13 3 5356. Redford Donald B. Shanks Hershel Meinhardt Jack 1997. Aspects of Monotheism How God is One Conference paper and proceedings. Washington D.C. Biblical Archaeology Society. ISBN 9781880317198. OCLC 37608180. Redford Donald B. May 2013. Akhenaten New Theories and Old Facts. Bulletin of the American Schools of Oriental Research. 369 369. American Schools of Oriental Research 934. doi
10.5 6
15 bullamerschoorie.3
69.0 009. ISSN 00030
97 X. JSTOR 
10.5 6
15 bullamerschoorie.3
69.0 00. OCLC 05748058. Reeves Nicholas 2019 2001. Akhenaten Egypts False Prophet Electronic ed.. London New York Thames  Hudson. ISBN 9780500294697. LCCN 00108868. Rogers Robert William ed. 1912. Cuneiform Parallels to the Old Testament. London Toronto Melbourne and Bombay Oxford University Press. The royal family at Amarna. University College London. 2001. Retrieved June 10 2020. Ridley Ronald Thomas 2019. Akhenaten A Historians View. The AUC History of Ancient Egypt. Cairo New York The American University in Cairo Press. ISBN 9789774167935. Robins G. 1993. Women in Ancient Egypt. Harvard University Press. Ross Barbara NovemberDecember 1999. Akhenaten and Rib Hadda from Byblos. Saudi Aramco World. 50 6 3035. Archived from the original on January 13 2010. Retrieved August 8 2013. Schemm Paul February 16 2010. A Frail King Tut Died From Malaria Broken Leg. USA Today. Associated Press. Schulman Alan R. 1982. The Nubian War of Akhenaten. Lgyptologie en 1979 Axes prioritaires de recherches. Colloques internationaux du Centre national de la recherche scientifique. Vol. 2. Paris Editions du Centre national de la recherche scientifique. pp. 299316. ISBN 9782222029298. Sethe Kurt ed. 19061909. Urkunden der 18. Dynastie Documents of the 
18 th Dynasty PDF. Urkunden des gyptischen Altertums in German. Vol. 4. Leipzig Germany J.C. Hinrichssche Buchhandlung. Archived PDF from the original on June 6 2020. Retrieved June 12 2020. Shaw Ian ed. 2003 2000. The Oxford History of Ancient Egypt New ed.. Oxford New York Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780192804587. Shaw Ian 2004. Ancient Egypt A Very Short Introduction. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780191578403. Shupak Nili 1995. The Monotheism of Moses and the Monotheism of Akhenaten. The Bible as a Meeting Point of Cultures through the Ages. Sevivoth. pp. 1827. Silverman David P. Wegner Josef W. Wegner Jennifer Houser 2006. Akhenaten and Tutankhamun Revolution and Restoration 
1 st ed.. Philadelphia Pennsylvania University of Pennsylvania Museum of Archeology and Anthropology. ISBN 9781931707909. Smith Elliot ed. 1923. Tutankhamen and the discovery of his tomb by the late Earl of Canarvon and Mr Howard Carter. London Routledge. Sooke Alastair January 9 2014. Akhenaten mad bad or brilliant. The Daily Telegraph. Archived from the original on January 11 2022. Retrieved May 10 2020. Sooke Alastair February 4 2016. How ancient Egypt shaped our idea of beauty. Culture. British Broadcasting Corporation. Retrieved May 25 2020. Spence Kate February 17 2011. Akhenaten and the Amarna Period. BBC.co.uk. BBC. Retrieved May 10 2020. Stent Gunther Siegmund 2002. Paradoxes of Free Will. Transactions of the American Philosophical Society. Vol. 92. Philadelphia Pennsylvania American Philosophical Society. ISBN 0871699265. OCLC 50773277. Strachey James 1939. Preliminary Notes Upon the Problem of Akhenaten. International Journal of PsychoAnalysis. 20 3342. ISSN 00207578. Retrieved June 12 2020. Strouhal Eugen 2010. Biological age of skeletonized mummy from Tomb KV 55 at Thebes. Anthropologie. 48 2. Brno Czech Republic Moravian Museum 97112. JSTOR 26292898. Takcs Sarolta Anna Cline Eric H. eds. 2015 2007. Akhenaten also Akhenaton r. ca. 13531335 B.C.E.. The Ancient World. Vol. 15. London New York Routledge. ISBN 9780765680822. LCCN 2006101384. Trigger Bruce Graham Kemp Barry OConnor David Bourke Lloyd Alan Brian 2001 1983. Ancient Egypt A Social History. Cambridge New York Cambridge University Press. ISBN 0521284279. LCCN 8222196. Tyldesley Joyce Ann 1998. Nefertiti Egypts Sun Queen. London Viking. ISBN 9780670869985. OCLC 1153684328. Tyldesley Joyce A. 2005. Egypt How a Lost Civilisation was Rediscovered. Berkeley California University of California Press. ISBN 9780520250208. Tyldesley Joyce A. 2006. Chronicle of the Queens of Egypt From Early Dynastic Times to the Death of Cleopatra. New York Thames  Hudson. ISBN 0500051453. OCLC 61189103. Wilkinson Richard H. 2003. The Complete Gods and Goddesses of Ancient Egypt. London Thames  Hudson. ISBN 0500051208. Zaki Mey 2008. The Legacy of Tutankhamun Art and History. Photographs by Farid Atiya. Giza Egypt Farid Atiya Press. ISBN 9789771749301. Further reading Aldred Cyril 1973. Akhenaten and Nefertiti. London Thames  Hudson. Aldred Cyril 1984. The Egyptians. London Thames  Hudson. Allen James Peter 1994. Nefertiti and Smenkhkare. Gttinger Miszellen. 141. Gttingen Germany Verlag der Gttinger Miszellen 717. ISSN 03443
85 X. Asante Molefi Kete Mazama Ama 2009. Encyclopedia of African Religion. Thousand Oaks California Sage Publications. Ashrafian Hutan September 2012. Familial epilepsy in the pharaohs of ancient Egypts 
18 th Dynasty. Epilepsy  Behavior. 25 1 2331. doi
10.1 0
16 j.yebeh.20
12.0 
6.0 14. PMID 22980077. S
2 CID 20771815. Bilolo Mubabinge 2004 1988. Sect. I vol. 2. Le Crateur et la Cration dans la pense memphite et amarnienne. Approche synoptique du Document Philosophique de Memphis et du Grand Hymne Thologique dEchnaton in French new ed.. MunichParis Academy of African Thought. avka Mislav Kelava Kelava avka Vlatka Bui eljko Oluji Boris Brkljai Boris March 2010. Homocystinuria a possible solution of the Akhenatens mystery. Collegium Antropologicum. 34 Suppl. 1. Croatian Anthropological Society 255258. ISSN 03506134. PMID 20402329. El Mahdy Christine 1999. Tutankhamen The Life and Death of a Boy King. Headline. Choi B Pak A 2001. Lessons for surveillance in the 
21 st century a historical perspective from the past five millennia. Soz Praventivmed. 46 6 361368. doi
10.1 0
07 BF01321662. hdl
10.1 0
07 BF01321662. PMID 11851070. S
2 CID 12263035. Locker Melissa September 12 2013. Did King Tutankhamen Die From Epilepsy. Time. Mlek Jaromr 1996. The Coregency relief of Akhenaten and Smenkhare from Memphis. In Der Manuelian Peter Freed Rita E. eds.. Studies in Honor of William Kelly Simpson PDF. Vol. 2. Boston Museum of Fine Arts. ISBN 0878463909. Archived PDF from the original on October 9 2022. Retrieved June 1 2020. Miller Jared L. 2007. Amarna Age Chronology and the Identity of Nibh ururiyain the Light of a Newly Reconstructed Hittite Text PDF. Altorientalische Forschungen. 34 2. De Gruyter 252293. Archived PDF from the original on February 12 2020. Retrieved June 9 2020. Rita E. Freed Yvonne J. Markowitz 1999. Sue H. DAuria ed.. Pharaohs of the Sun Akhenaten  Nefertiti  Tutankhamen. Bulfinch Press. Gestoso Singer Graciela 2008. El Intercambio de Bienes entre Egipto y Asia Anterior. Desde el reinado de Tuthmosis III hasta el de Akhenaton Free Access in Spanish Ancient Near East Monographs Volume 2. Buenos Aires Society of Biblical Literature  CEHAO. Holland Tom 1998. The Sleeper in the Sands novel Abacus  a fictionalised adventure story based closely on the mysteries of Akhenatens reign Kozloff Arielle 2006. Bubonic Plague in the Reign of Amenhotep III. KMT. 17 3. McAvoy S. 2007. Mummy 61074 a Strange Case of Mistaken Identity. Antiguo Oriente. 5 183194. Najovits Simson. Egypt Trunk of the Tree Volume I The Contexts Volume II The Consequences Algora Publishing New York 2003 and 2004. On Akhenaten Vol. II Chapter 11 pp. 11773 and Chapter 12 pp. 20513 Redford Donald B. 1984. Akhenaten The Heretic King. Princeton University Press Shortridge K 1992. Pandemic influenza a zoonosis. Semin Respir Infect. 7 1 1125. PMID 1609163. Stevens Anna 2012. Akhenatens workers  the Amarna Stone village survey 20052009. Volume I The survey excavations and architecture. Egypt Exploration Society. Van Dyke John Charles 1887. Principles of Art Pt. 1. Art in History Pt. 2. Art in Theory. New York New York Fords Howard  Hulbert. Retrieved June 19 2020. Wolf Walther 1951. Die Stellung der gyptischen Kunst zur antiken und abendlndischen und Das Problem des Knstlers in der gyptischen Kunst in German. Hildesheim Germany Gerstenberg. External links Akhenaten at Wikipedias sister projects Definitions from Wiktionary Media from Commons Quotations from Wikiquote Texts from Wikisource Data from Wikidata Akhenaten on In Our Time at the BBC The City of Akhetaten The Great Hymn to the Aten M.A. Mansoor Amarna Collection Grim secrets of Pharaohs city BBC Ancestry and Pathology in King Tutankhamuns Family Hawass The Long Coregency Revisited the Tomb of Kheruef Archived June 13 2011 at the Wayback Machine by Peter Dorman University of Chicago Royal Relations Tuts father is very likely Akhenaten. National Geographic 09. 2010 Archived August 9 2011 at the Wayback Machine v t e Amarna Period Pharaohs Akhenaten Smenkhkare Neferneferuaten Tutankhamun Ay Royal family Tiye Nefertiti Kiya The Younger Lady Tey Children Meritaten Meketaten Ankhesenamun Neferneferuaten Tasherit Neferneferure Setepenre Meritaten Tasherit Ankhesenpaaten Tasherit Nobles Officials Aperel Bek Huya Ipy Mahu Maia May Meryneith Meryre Meryre II Mutbenret Nakhtpaaten Neferkheperuhersekheper Paatenemheb Panehesy Parennefer Penthu Ramose Thutmose Locations Akhetaten Karnak KV55 KV62 Amarna Tombs Other Amarna letters Amarna succession Aten Atenism Dakhamunzu Amarna Art Style v t e Pharaohs Protodynastic to First Intermediate Period 31502040 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Protodynastic pre3150 BC Lower Hedju Hor NyHor NiNeith HatHor Pu Hsekiu Khayu Tiu Thesh Neheb Wazner Mekh A Double Falcon Wash Upper A Finger Snail Fish PenAbu Stork Bull Scorpion I Shendjw IryHor Ka Scorpion II Narmer  Menes Early Dynastic 31502686 BC I Narmer  Menes HorAha Djer Djet Den Anedjib Semerkhet Qaa Sneferka Horus Bird II Hotepsekhemwy Nebra Nynetjer Ba Nubnefer Horus Sa WenegNebty Wadjenes Senedj SethPeribsen SekhemibPerenmaat Neferkara I Neferkasokar Hudjefa I Khasekhemwy Old Kingdom 26862181 BC III Djoser Sekhemkhet Sanakht Nebka Khaba Sedjes Qahedjet Huni IV Snefru Khufu Djedefre Khafre Bikheris Menkaure Shepseskaf Thamphthis V Userkaf Sahure Neferirkare Kakai Neferefre Shepseskare Nyuserre Ini Menkauhor Kaiu Djedkare Isesi Unas VI Teti Userkare Pepi I Merenre Nemtyemsaf I Pepi II Merenre Nemtyemsaf II Netjerkare Siptah Neferka Nefer 
1 st Intermediate 21812040 BC VIIVIII Menkare Neferkare II Neferkare III Neby Djedkare Shemai Neferkare IV Khendu Merenhor Neferkamin Nikare Neferkare V Tereru Neferkahor Neferkare VI Pepiseneb Neferkamin Anu Qakare Iby Neferkaure Neferkauhor Neferirkare Wadjkare Khuiqer Khui Iytjenu IX Meryibre Khety Neferkare VII Nebkaure Khety Setut Imhotep X Meryhathor Neferkare VIII Wahkare Khety Merykare Middle Kingdom and Second Intermediate Period 20401550 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Middle Kingdom 20401802 BC XI Mentuhotep I Intef I Intef II Intef III Mentuhotep II Mentuhotep III Mentuhotep IV Nubia Segerseni Qakare Ini Iyibkhentre XII Amenemhat I Senusret I Amenemhat II Senusret II Senusret III Amenemhat III Amenemhat IV Sobekneferu Seankhibtawy Seankhibra 
2 nd Intermediate 18021550 BC XIII Sekhemrekhutawy Sobekhotep Sonbef Nerikare Sekhemkare Amenemhat V Ameny Qemau Hotepibre Iufni Ameny Antef Amenemhet VI Semenkare Nebnuni Sehetepibre Sewadjkare Nedjemibre Khaankhre Sobekhotep Renseneb Hor Sekhemrekhutawy Khabaw Djedkheperew Sebkay Sedjefakare Wegaf Khendjer Imyremeshaw Sehetepkare Intef Seth Meribre Sobekhotep III Neferhotep I Sihathor Sobekhotep IV Merhotepre Sobekhotep Khahotepre Sobekhotep Wahibre Ibiau Merneferre Ay Merhotepre Ini Sankhenre Sewadjtu Mersekhemre Ined Sewadjkare Hori Merkawre Sobekhotep Mershepsesre Ini II Sewahenre Senebmiu Merkheperre Merkare Sewadjare Mentuhotep Seheqenre Sankhptahi XIV Yakbim Sekhaenre Yaammu Nubwoserre Qareh Khawoserre Ammu Ahotepre Maaibre Sheshi Nehesy Khakherewre Nebefawre Sehebre Merdjefare Sewadjkare III Nebdjefare Nebsenre Sekheperenre Bebnum Apepi Nuya Wazad Sheneh Shenshek Khamure Yakareb YaqubHar XV Sharek Semqen AperAnati Salitis SakirHar Khyan Yanassi Apepi Khamudi XVI Djehuti Sobekhotep VIII Neferhotep III Mentuhotepi Nebiryraw I Nebiriau II Semenre Bebiankh Sekhemre Shedwast Dedumose I Dedumose II Montuemsaf Merankhre Mentuhotep Senusret IV Pepi III Abydos Senebkay Wepwawetemsaf Pantjeny Snaaib XVII Rahotep Nebmaatre Sobekemsaf I Sobekemsaf II SekhemreWepmaat Intef Nubkheperre Intef SekhemreHeruhirmaat Intef Senakhtenre Ahmose Seqenenre Tao Kamose New Kingdom and Third Intermediate Period 1550664 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain New Kingdom 15501070 BC XVIII Ahmose I Amenhotep I Thutmose I Thutmose II Hatshepsut Thutmose III Amenhotep II Thutmose IV Amenhotep III Akhenaten Smenkhkare Neferneferuaten Tutankhamun Ay Horemheb XIX Ramesses I Seti I Ramesses II Merneptah Amenmesses Seti II Siptah Twosret XX Setnakhte Ramesses III Ramesses IV Ramesses V Ramesses VI Ramesses VII Ramesses VIII Ramesses IX Ramesses X Ramesses XI 
3 rd Intermediate 1069664 BC XXI Smendes Amenemnisu Psusennes I Amenemope Osorkon the Elder Siamun Psusennes II High Priests of Amun Herihor Piankh Pinedjem I Masaharta Djedkhonsuefankh Menkheperre Smendes II Pinedjem II Psusennes III XXII Shoshenq I Osorkon I Shoshenq II Tutkheperre Shoshenq Takelot I Osorkon II Shoshenq III Shoshenq IV Pami Shoshenq V Pedubast II Osorkon IV XXIII Harsiese A Takelot II Pedubast I Iuput I Shoshenq VI Osorkon III Takelot III Rudamun Shoshenq VII Menkheperre Ini XXIV Tefnakht Bakenranef XXV Piye Shebitku Shabaka Taharqa Tanutamun Late Period and Hellenistic Period 66430 BC Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Late 664332 BC XXVI Ammeris Tefnakht II Nekauba Necho I Psamtik I Necho II Psamtik II Wahibre Ahmose II Psamtik III XXVII Cambyses II Petubastis III Darius I Psammetichus IV Xerxes Artaxerxes I Darius II XXVIII Amyrtaeus XXIX Nepherites I Hakor Psammuthes Nepherites II Muthis XXX Nectanebo I Teos Nectanebo II XXXI Artaxerxes III Khabash Arses Darius III Hellenistic 33230 BC Argead Alexander the Great Philip III Arrhidaeus Alexander IV Ptolemaic Ptolemy I Soter Ptolemy II Philadelphus Arsinoe II Ptolemy III Euergetes Berenice II Euergetes Ptolemy IV Philopator Arsinoe III Philopator Ptolemy V Epiphanes Cleopatra I Syra Ptolemy VI Philometor Cleopatra II Ptolemy VII Neos Philopator Ptolemy VIII Euergetes Cleopatra III Ptolemy IX Soter Cleopatra IV Ptolemy X Alexander I Berenice III Ptolemy XI Alexander II Ptolemy XII Neos Dionysos Cleopatra V Berenice IV Epiphaneia Cleopatra VI Tryphaena Cleopatra VII Philopator Ptolemy XIII Theos Philopator Arsinoe IV Ptolemy XIV Philopator Ptolemy XV Caesarion Roman Period 30 BC313 AD Period Dynasty Pharaohs male female uncertain Roman 30 BC313 AD XXXIV Augustus Tiberius Caligula Claudius Nero Galba Otho Vitellius Vespasian Titus Domitian Nerva Trajan Hadrian Antoninus Pius Lucius Verus Marcus Aurelius Commodus Pertinax Pescennius Niger Septimius Severus Geta Caracalla Macrinus Diadumenian Elagabalus Severus Alexander Maximinus Thrax Gordian I Gordian II Pupienus Balbinus Gordian III Philip Decius Trebonianus Gallus Aemilianus Valerian Macrianus Minor Quietus Lucius Mussius Aemilianus Gallienus Claudius Gothicus Quintillus Aurelian Tacitus Probus Carus Carinus Numerian Diocletian Maximian Galerius Maximinus Daza Dynastic genealogies 
1 st 
2 nd 
3 rd 
4 th 
11 th 
12 th 
18 th 
19 th 
20 th 
21 st to 
23 rd 
24 th 
25 th 
26 th 
27 th 
30 th 
31 st Argead Ptolemaic List of pharaohs v t e Tutankhamun Family Akhenaten father The Younger Lady mother Ankhesenamun wife 3
17 a and 3
17 b mummies daughters Amenhotep III grandfather Tiye grandmother Artifacts and exhibitions Mask Mummy Anubis Shrine Head of Nefertem Lotus chalice Trumpets Meteoric iron dagger Chariots Exhibitions Tomb Discovery Howard Carter Earl of Carnarvon Harry Burton Arthur Callender Lady Evelyn Herbert Alfred Lucas Albert Lythgoe Arthur Mace Popular culture Of Time Tombs and Treasures 1977 documentary The Curse of King Tuts Tomb 1980 film Mysteries of Egypt 1998 film Tutenstein 2003 series Egypt 2005 TV series The Curse of King Tuts Tomb 2006 film Tut 2015 miniseries Tutankhamun 2016 miniseries Steve Martin song Curse of the pharaohs v t e Timeline of the Ancient Near East Category Authority control databases International FAST ISNI VIAF 2 National France BnF data Germany Israel United States Czech Republic Greece Netherlands Vatican Academics CiNii Artists ULAN People Deutsche Biographie Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleAkhenatenoldid1222182967 Categories Akhenaten 
14 thcentury BC Pharaohs Pharaohs of the Eighteenth Dynasty of Egypt 
14 thcentury BC births 13
30 s BC deaths Atenism Egyptian religious leaders Founders of religions Historical negationism in ancient Egypt Children of Amenhotep III Tutankhamun 
14 thcentury BC religious leaders City founders Damnatio memoriae Hidden categories Pages using the WikiHiero extension Pages using the EasyTimeline extension Articles with short description Short description is different from Wikidata Wikipedia indefinitely semiprotected pages Use mdy dates from May 2020 Articles containing Ancient Egyptianlanguage text Pages with Semitic languages IPA CS1 Germanlanguage sources de CS1 long volume value CS1 Frenchlanguage sources fr Articles with Spanishlanguage sources es Pages using Sister project links with wikidata namespace mismatch Pages using Sister project links with hidden wikidata Pages using Sister project links with default search Webarchive template wayback links Articles with FAST identifiers Articles with ISNI identifiers Articles with VIAF identifiers Articles with BNF identifiers Articles with BNFdata identifiers Articles with GND identifiers Articles with J
9 U identifiers Articles with LCCN identifiers Articles with NKC identifiers Articles with NLG identifiers Articles with NTA identifiers Articles with VcBA identifiers Articles with CINII identifiers Articles with ULAN identifiers Articles with DTBIO identifiers Year of birth uncertain This page was last edited on 4 May 2024 at 1222 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width